A guide to the colourful shopfronts of Europe
Paris musicians put on concert in front of occupied Odéon TheatreArtists, musicians and many temporary or short-contract workers who depend on cultural events for a living have seen their work stopped because of COVID restrictions.
Five thousand-strong crowd enjoy rock concert after COVID screenFive thousand-strong crowd enjoy rock concert after COVID screen
Bono launches vaccine access campaign with animation series
Ten years in the making, an indie film pays tribute to The Smiths
Would you go to a bar that doesn't serve alcohol?
Exploring Vienna cafés: A look at coffee culture in Austria’s capital
David Guetta performs COVID charity concert in Dubai
'Disbelief': Brits reflect on a bizarre year since the first lockdownEuronews spoke to a teacher, doctor, tour manager, actor and student to find out how the coronavirus pandemic has impacted their work and lives.
Bosnia and Serbia: Why are the neighbours worlds apart on vaccines?
Dutch experiment could lead to return of big events
Is Birmingham the UK's most underrated city?
New lockdowns begin in France and Poland as COVID-19 infections soar
Nine of France's most beautiful hidden villages
The new museums and galleries you need to visit after COVIDWhether delayed by the pandemic or opening just to locals, here are the best new cultural spaces you need to check out.
What can we learn from the men seeking gold and friendship in mines
Berlin theatre manager quits amid bullying, sexual harassment claimsEmployees have “reported incidents of abuse of power, bullying, verbal violence and sexual harassment.”
How to enjoy the craic and have a virtual St Patrick’s DayA virtual or socially-distanced St Patrick’s Day doesn’t have to mean less fun. Head online to enjoy the craic.
'Shadow Game' the big winner at the FIFDH"We have all been there, we all have been young and all experienced the same aspirations that they have" - Els van Driel, the film director of 'Shadow Game' tells all about her award-winning production.
Grammys: Female artists triumph as Beyoncé, Taylor Swift make history
In Mitrovica, a bridge that separates Albanians and Serbs | ExtractMitrovica's Main Bridge is both a symbol of the town’s division and its most popular tourist attraction.
Sonya Yoncheva showcases her unique voice in a breathtaking performance"Many colours in me changed. I'm another woman, growing, changing every day” - Sonya Yoncheva puts on a stunning and unique performance in the "Met Stars Live in Concert".
EU rejects claim that European funds financed Lukashenko's 'goldmine'A new documentary film alleges that EU funds contributed to financing Lukashenko's regime and his lavish lifestyle. The bloc has rejected the accusations as "completely unfounded and baseless."
Here are 5 of Europe's unmissable road trips
Protesters demand withdrawal of Cyprus' 'satanic' Eurovision entry
The 16 most useful travel apps for planning your next trip
Left behind in no man's land: plight of Lesotho's mining families
Dolly Parton sings COVID-themed 'Jolene' version as she gets vaccine
Which music festivals are going ahead in Europe in 2021?
'Nomadland,' 'Borat' win at a socially distant Golden GlobesNetflix also won big with 'The Crown' and 'The Queen's Gambit' taking home the award in their respective categories.
7 fantastic cities in Europe you don’t have to fly to
Cellist Camille Thomas fills empty Louvre with classical musicEmpty of its usual visitors, the Louvre's gallery spaces were filled with the strains of Bach in a performance by cellist Camille Thomas who went viral in France's first lockdown.
The best adult-only escapes in Europe for alone time with your partner
Musicians play as Myanmar coup protests continueThe rally drew hundreds of protesters, who sang and danced to the beat while holding up the three-fingered salute that has come to symbolise resistance to the coup.
Cecilia Bartoli: A new artistic direction for the Opera de Monte-CarloFrom 2023, the Italian mezzo-soprano, Cecilia Bartoli, will be the new artistic director of the Opera de Monte-Carlo, the first-ever woman to lead the opera house.
UK's Reading and Leeds music festivals to go ahead this summer
Three jailed for helping ex-Nissan boss Carlos Ghosn flee to LebanonThree jailed for helping ex-Nissan boss Carlos Ghosn flee to Lebanon
Why a rapper’s arrest has led to carnage on the streets of BarcelonaFor more than a week protests have raged over the jailing of rapper Pablo Hasél, whose sentence has ignited a heated debate over freedom of expression in Spain.
Youth-led protest gets musical as it kicks off in downtown YangonYouth-led protest gets musical as it kicks off in downtown Yangon
Human After All: Electro duo Daft Punk call it quits after 28 yearsThe world’s most famous electronic music duo, Daft Punk, have announced they are splitting up.
A day in the life of a ski resort during COVID-19
Tunisian doctor dazzles virus ward with violinA doctor in the Tunisian city of Sfax has taken to the violin in an attempt to boost the spirits of patients battling the coronavirus.
Meet the Cuban hotel owners turning to farming for survival
Six climate-friendly ideas to take from EU green capital LahtiFinland’s ninth-largest city is, with its modest population of just 120,00 inhabitants, not used to being a capital. But this year is different. Here's why.
Verdi’s Aida with Jonas Kaufmann keeps its magnificence whilst avoiding stereotypes
Illegal miners make tough choices to provide for their families
Protests break out in Spain over arrest of anti-monarchy rapperEmergency services said Wednesday that 33 people were treated for injuries in the disturbances.
Football for Friendship awards Bolivian 'superwomen' girls academy
Myanmar street orchestra belts out new protest songThe rebel music is aimed at encouraging youths to go against the military after the state coup earlier in February.
8 reasons to put Cardiff on your travel bucket list
Lockdown love: How has the world been dating during COVID pandemic?
Chick Corea, Grammy-winning jazz pianist, dies aged 79The jazz musician won a staggering 23 Grammy Awards and could posthumously win this year.
Conch shell found in French cave oldest known seashell instrumentThe shell, thought to be around 18,000 years old, was found during the excavation of a cave with prehistoric wall paintings in France - and it still works.
Arrests in Europe over €82.4m SIM swapping scam targeting celebrities
Objects thrown at Spain's Vox party leader during election campaign
David Guetta performs from top of Burj Al Arab in DubaiDavid Guetta streamed live on his Youtube channel his free performance on the helipad the building.
Oscar winner, ‘Sound of Music’ star Christopher Plummer dies
Podcast | The European origins of today's homophobia in Africa
Greenpeace releases a library of natural sounds for musicians to use
Take a look inside the school bus converted into a tiny homeA virtual tour of this sustainable home on wheels, kitted out with recycled materials and powered by solar energy.
Golden Globes: 3 women nominated for directing as Netflix tops nodsThree women, Emerald Fennell, Chloe Zhao and Regina King, were nominated for best director of a motion picture. Only one woman has previously won the award.
Rapper arrested in Austria and accused of publishing neo-Nazi songs
What are Indian farmers protesting and how is Rihanna involved?A backlash against ‘sensationalist’ celebrity tweets emerges, as farmers continue to strike on the streets of India.
Belgian hearing into Paris attacks accomplices beginsA court in Brussels begins its hearing into the 20 people accused of aiding and abetting the terrorists involved in the 2015 attacks in the French capital.
France opens talks in bid to regain public trust in policeIn November video of Paris police appearing to beat and abuse a black music producer inside his studio shocked the country.
Grammy-nominated artist, Sophie, dies in accident in Athens
Co-working camps are set to be the big travel trend of 2021
Previously unknown Mozart piece enthuses Mozart weekFamous pianist, Seong-Jin Cho, gives the world premiere of a recently discovered Mozart piano solo, 'Allegro in D - K.626b/16, during Mozart week at the Salzburg Mozarteum Foundation.
Meet the TikTok stars using viral videos to save the planetEcoTok has harnessed the video sharing app to help Gen Z to see themselves in climate related careers.
Kenyan inventors create bio-robotic arm controlled by brain signals
A year on from lockdown, Wuhan's young enjoy their freedomAs the rest of the world continues to grapple with lockdowns and soaring infections, young people in the city, once the epicentre of the novel coronavirus, are enjoying their hard-earned freedom.
Europe's week: Brussels eager for a new start after Biden inauguration
Podcast | A dilemma of coming-out in patriarchal societies
UK's Glastonbury music festival cancelled for second year in a row
Salisbury Cathedral becomes hub for huge COVID-19 vaccination driveMelding the ornate trappings of medieval faith with 21st century science, Salisbury Cathedral is injecting new hope into Britain's biggest ever vaccination programme.
Fireworks light up sky as Hollywood stars turn out for Biden-HarrisThe nighttime display followed performances by a parade of celebrities who descended on Washington to welcome the new Biden-Harris administration.
Musicians blast UK government on 'unviable' EU tours under Brexit dealIn a letter to The Times, over 100 musicians say post-Brexit European tours "will now need costly work permits and a mountain of paperwork" for equipment.
Music producer Phil Spector, who invented 'wall of sound', dies age 81Spector, who revolutionised pop with his "wall of sound" music production formula, was serving a prison sentence for the 2003 murder of Hollywood actress Lana Clarkson.
British bands stung by post-Brexit touring costs
Musicians fear Brexit has cut a decades-long cultural link with Europe
Vienna Philharmonic lifts spirits with iconic New Year's ConcertThe Vienna Philharmonic sends a message of 'hope and optimism' to the world with its New Year Concert. For the first time ever the concert was performed without an audience, instead, it was broadcast to millions across the globe.
Which destinations need tourism most to survive after COVID-19?
Eastern Ukraine: an industrial tourism destination in pictures
Can music change societies? Meet Burundian artist Yves Kami
Podcast | The story of when Dakar was the “gay capital” of West Africa
UK live music industry calls for help to save summer festival seasonBecause of the uncertainty caused by COVID-19, UK festival organisers say they need government insurance support to save summer events such as Glastonbury.
Grammy Awards delayed to March due to COVID-19 pandemic conditionsThe 2021 Grammy Awards will no longer take place this month in Los Angeles and will broadcast in March due to a recent surge in coronavirus cases and deaths.
The best nature experiences along Europe’s iconic waterways
Rome daredevils throw themselves into River Tiber to welcome new yearIt's a New Year's Day tradition in the Italian capital.
European capitals mark New Year at midnight amid coronavirus measures
7 fantastic cities in Europe you don’t have to fly to
The best of Euronews Living's guest writers in 2020We've rounded up ten of our favourite articles from guest contributors over the last 12 months.
Watch: This is how Europe and the world welcomed in 2021
Harry and Meghan release podcast with special message from son Archie
Christmas Eve concert held in Paris' fire-wrecked Notre DameIt was the first event of this kind since the Paris landmark was devastated by fire in April 2019.
Christmas Eve Jingle: Britons gear up to spread festive cheerThe initiative, named the "Christmas Eve Jingle", was launched in October by Mary Beggs-Reid, as a way for her local community in Harrogate, northern England, to celebrate the holiday together despite measures in place to combat the spread of the deadly pandemic.
La Scala's dreamlike night
Lisa Scott-Lee: From Dubai headmistress to life as a popstar
This Scottish island celebrates Christmas 12 days late
Final goodbye: Recalling influential figures lost in 2020From Ruth Bader Ginsburg to Sean Connery, Euronews recalls some influential figures lost in 2020 and the legacies they left behind.
Virtual idol digital avatars take to the real-life stage in ChinaAlthough the phenomenon originated in Japan, virtual idols are now stealing airtime in China, appearing at concerts, TV shows, billboards and even news programmes.
Japan keeps culture alive during the pandemicWe take a look at the ways Japan is getting its traditional theatre performances known as Kabuki out to audiences during the pandemic. Then we go for a stroll to an open-air art festival specially adapted to COVID times.
Café de Paris fans ‘gutted’ after iconic London venue shuts for good
French music programme puts children in orchestra for freeA musical education programme has been taking orchestras to neighbourhoods where conservatory seems out of reach.
7 best winter destinations in Europe
Could buying green gifts bring you a 'warm glow' this festive season?
New do-it-yourself COVID test kit is music to ears of Czech orchestra
"Silence, serenity and peace": Sir Bryn Terfel's Christmas message
Podcast | What it’s like to be a gay man in Senegal
Flamenco artists in Spain protest COVID-19 restrictionsFlamenco performers protested a lack of government aid, saying they were concerned for the survival of the art form amid the pandemic restrictions.
Barcelona concert tests use of same-day COVID-19 screeningFive hundred Barcelona residents attended a concert as part of a medical study to determine if same-day testing could help prevent COVID-19 spread at cultural events.
Football for Friendship goes digitalFootball for Friendship is an International Children’s Social Programme which unites kids worldwide. Its aim is for kids to share their experiences, meet new friends and learn from one another whilst promoting a health and human values.
Mothers' Day celebrations toned down in Panama amid pandemicDue to a coronavirus curfew, traditional serenades were performed during the day, when usually they take place at night or early in the morning.
Discover Europe's wildest ski destinations outside of the Alps
A 'normal man': John Lennon expert on the man behind the legend
Bonga: The portrait of a revolutionary singerFamous Angolan singer, Bonga, has been an athlete and stood up against colonial rule. His music is known worldwide and continues to inspire.
Universal Music Group snaps up Bob Dylan's entire back catalogueThe purchase of the legendary singer-songwriter's work is thought to be one of the company's biggest acquisitions - yet no financial details have been given.
Exploring Saint Petersburg's rich history and modern charms
Nearly 100 arrested during another anti-security law protest in France
Experiences you can buy the travel lover in your life this Christmas
How are Jordanian musicians adapting Western pop songs into Arabic?Kalamesque is a group made up of Jordanian musicians, and they’re adapting Western pop music into classical Arabic songs.
Musica highlights 2020: Puccini's timeless La Boheme
10 eco-friendly Christmas presents for friends and familyCelebrate Christmas and help the environment this year with our green gift guide.
Belarusian musicians playing prison blues as protest strategy changes
French government to 'totally rewrite' controversial security measure
This man is playing piano for Thailand’s hungry monkeysIn Lopburi, tourists have stopped coming creating a problem for the city's macaques.
Four police officers indicted over Michel Zecler beating in Paris
France security bill: 62 police injured and 81 arrested at protests
Talking culture: Dior stands by Depp and hope for music festivals
Is Lithuania's female-led government a sign of improved equality?
Macron says images of black man's violent arrest 'shame us'
Protests in Brazil after black man beaten by supermarket security
Killing of black man at supermarket sparks protests across BrazilThe man died after being beaten by supermarket security on the eve of Brazil's annual Black Consciousness Day, sparking angry protests at Carrefour shops across the country.
The show goes on at Madrid's opera house despite coronavirus
Children in the Middle East & North Africa want funnier, relatable Arabic cartoonsFor many children in the Middle East and North Africa, who have grown up almost exclusively watching international animations, finding relatable cartoons can be a challenge.
'Live Aid for the climate crisis' endorsed by celebs and activists
A look back at Massenet's “Manon“ at the Opéra Bastille
Emerging from lockdown - Dubai’s music scene hits the right notes
Five years after Paris' deadly terror attacks, the scars remainFor one survivor, restrictions on events to remember the November 13 attacks has not helped the healing process.
German court declares techno to be music, giving clubs tax breakThe clubbing sector has been devastated by the coronavirus outbreak - but now clubs in Germany are in line for a tax break after a court recognised techno as music.
Women make music with kitchen items to highlight female 'suffering'
Sign language interpreters take on hip hop in ParisSign language interpreters performed alongside artists at a hip hop concert -- without a live audience -- that took place in Paris on Saturday.
Bordeaux's national opera turns to recording amid COVID-19 lockdown
What can men learn from a group of former violent husbands in Burundi?
What has French president Macron said to outrage the Muslim world?
UK music industry in COVID-19 crisis as artists struggleArtists as diverse as Russell Watson and the Undertones are demanding guidance and practical help from the government as the UK music industry's COVID-19 related shutdown crisis shows no sign of abating.
Views from a rabbi, a priest & an imam on the Abrahamic house being built in Abu DhabiReligious history was made in Abu Dhabi last year, when the Document on Human Fraternity was signed in February by Pope Francis and Dr. Ahmed Al Tayeb, the Grand Imam of Al-Azhar.
Guatemalans make offerings to folk hero San Simon for COVID protectionSan Simon is a venerated folk saint in the indigenous village of San Andres Itzapa, western Guatemala.
US election: Trump and Biden campaign in key states in final stretch
The top five European cities for celebrating Halloween
Dubai breaks the record for the world's largest fountain
Meet Indigenous activist and hip-hop artist Xiuhtezcatl Martinez“The most important part of my indigeneity that informs my climate work is that this is not an isolated issue."
Rolando Villazón and Xavier de Maistre explore the soul of Latin AmericaWhat happens when a famous tenor and a master of the harp get together? The result is a very special programme: Rolando Villazón and Xavier de Maistre present the 'Serenata Latina' – “Across Latin America”.

Latin American melodies intimate – in this edition of Musica on euronews and
From tyrants to champions of gender equality: meet the Abatangamuco
France curfew extended as country records over 1m coronavirus cases
Aida: unheard version receives rapturous reception at La Scala
Beat the winter blues at some of Europe's best sunshine destinations
Guitar legend Eddie Van Halen dies of cancer, his family announces"My father, Edward Lodewijk Van Halen, has lost his long and arduous battle with cancer this morning," Wolf Van Halen wrote on Twitter.
Unclear what live shows will be like after COVID 'plague', says Depp
'Leave our children alone' Hungarian PM tells publisher of LGBT book
Twitter users flood #ProudBoys with images of gay pride
Sweeping melodies with Jonas Kaufmann at the Summer Night Concert
Will Belgium's new government delays push the country to split?Today (Wednesday), after nearly 500 days of intensive negotiations, the programme for a government led by Flemish liberal Alexander De Croo was finalised.
Greece's iconic monument, the Acropolis is bathed in new light
Young talent and big names in classical music gather in Georgia
This interactive map allows you to listen to forests around the world
Raspy-voiced French singer Juliette Greco dead at 93President Emmanuel Macron described Greco as " elegance and freedom" in a tribute on Twitter.
Liveurope Online Festival aims to give music scene a shot in the armLiveurope, an initiative supporting concert venues in their efforts to promote up-and-coming European artists, is to hold a Europe-wide online concert on Friday and Saturday.
Artists protest as COVID-19 restrictions tightened in AthensFrom September 21 until October 4, a maximum of nine people can gather inside or outside, except in restaurants, bars and coffee shops. Concerts and live musical performances have been banned and indoor cinemas closed.
Six unusual European festivals to add to your bucket list
Russian artist fills Moscow museum with colourful latex sculptures
Perpetual Music: Rolando Villazón and Renaud Capuçon mesmerise Paris
Jimi Hendrix legends and myths live on in Moroccan village
COVID Christmas? How the 'rule of six' could scupper festive tradePubs and clubs and those who work in them were hit hard by the coronavirus lockdown. With the 'rule of six' it could be about to get worse.
A new Mideast? Israel signs pacts with Arab states Bahrain and UAE
COVID-19 in France: Bordeaux and Marseille announce tougher constaintsThe stricter measures announced in Bordeaux and Marseille follow a surge in new cases. The French government wants to avoid a new nationwide lockdown.
Ukraine: Music's most extreme genre uses history to fight Russia
Germany: socially distanced rooftop symphonic concert
Families of Greek refugees who fled Turkey in 1922 tell their storiesThe descendants of Greek refugees who fled Turkey nearly a century ago tell Euronews their stories
Watch: September 11 attacks remembered at ceremonies across USSome victims' families are concerned the pandemic is being used as an excuse to allow the memory of their loved ones to fade.
Talented musicians join forces for the Perpetual Music Concert series
Rolling Stones memorabilia store opens its doors in London
Russia’s Bolshoi Theatre reopens after six month coronvirus lockdown
First chord change in seven years for John Cage organ compositionPlay it slow: Composer John Cage's 639-year legacy to the world undergoes its first chord change for seven years
Gustavo Dudamel's magical 'Firebird' inspires the Salzburg Festival
Can Japan's ancient Noh theatre survive coronavirus?With audiences and performers already dwindling even before the pandemic, some in the industry of traditional Japanese Noh play fear the virus may sound the death knell for an art considered one of the oldest extant theatre forms in the world.
Charlie Hebdo trial: How the terror attacks unfolded five years ago
Rolex Perpetual Music Concerts launched to support performers
Musicians try to lift spirits in COVID-hit Brazilian favelaA group of youth musicians from Heliopolis, the largest favela of Sao Paulo, performed on Tuesday in the streets of the neighbourhood in an attempt to provide a respite from COVID-19.
Faces of protest in Belarus
Meet the woman campaigning for her right to die just for being oldJacqueline Jancquel plans to have assisted suicide in December 2020. She’s 76 years old: she has no terminal illness, she’s not in a lot of pain.
Young people call for more green jobs in the UK on Earth Overshoot DayThey performed in the shadow of the UK's first commercial wind farm.
Scotland records highest number of new COVID-19 cases in 3 months
The invisible threat of noise pollution: How do we protect quiet?Noisy environments can be bad for both our mental and physical health.
Thousands attend pool party in Wuhan, former COVID-19 epicentre
The show goes on: 'Così fan tutte' at the Salzburg FestivalThe show goes on: Così fan tutte performed at the Salzburg Festival. Austria's music and drama festival returns to celebrate its first centenary, despite the coronavirus pandemic.
Row as Belgium beach towns ban day trippers amid heatwave
Lebanese student plays piano for volunteers in Beirut hospital
Woman plays Auld Lang Syne amid debris from Beirut blastAmid the debris and damage of an apartment caught in Beirut's blast, an elderly woman plays Auld Lang Syne on the piano.
Free parties on rise around Paris as clubs stay shut post-confinement
100th Salzburg festival goes ahead despite coronavirus pandemic
The supersized attractions of Downtown DubaiThe delights Downtown Dubai, described by many as ‘The Centre of Now’, include  supersized attractions such as the world’s tallest building, Burj Khalifa; a 10-million litre aquarium and a huge virtual reality park.
Why is Bollywood star Priyanka Chopra Jonas considering learning Arabic?Aged 18, Indian celebrity Priyanka Chopra was crowned Miss World in the 2000 pageant. It was to mark the start of a glittering career which has since seen her act, sing, write and mentor young performers.
Coronavirus consolation as open-air opera lifts spirits in Naples
Cultural highlights across Europe: Where and when to go
Fleetwood Mac co-founder blues guitarist Peter Green dies at 73B.B. King once said Green “has the sweetest tone I ever heard. He was the only one who gave me the cold sweats.”
How might the next invention by battery anode creator Rachid Yazami change your life?Moroccan scientist, Professor Rachid Yazami’s passion for science started as a child, in his native Fez, with a fascination for geology.
EU sets aside €1.6bn of financial firepower to reboot arts sector
In photographs: children document life on Turkish-Syrian border
Belgian DJ gives silent performance atop Brussels landmarkHe kept the performance secret to avoid crowds amid the coronavirus pandemic. For the same reason, only the DJ could hear what he was playing.
Kanye West launches official presidential bid at unconventional rally
Rome honours Oscar-winning soundtrack composer Ennio MorriconeThe City Council voted to rename one of its concert halls after Morricone as his soundtrack to the film Once Upon A Time in America was played.
'Dream come true': Italy's gesture 100 years after fascist arsonThe Narodni dom was a state-of-the-art cultural building. Italian fascists burnt it down in 1920 amid tensions between Italy and Yugoslavia.
Pamplona bull-running festival scrapped for first time in decades
Greece shuts Serbia border amid COVID-19 spike in the Balkans
UK arts sector 'warmly welcomes' €1.7bn COVID-19 rescue package
Musicians honour Syrian world heritage site with performance in Italy
Toronto art fans attend drive-in for socially distant Van Gogh exhibit
Kanye West says he will run for US president
Seven police officers injured in London as pubs reopens in England
Jeff Bezos invests in green stadium - but critics aren't convinced
Zac Efron looks for solutions to climate change in new Netflix series
Germany revamping elite military unit over far-right extremism: Report
Scarlet Sails Festival takes place in Russia without spectatorsThe annual Scarlet Sails festival takes place in honour of Russian school graduates but without spectators due to coronavirus restrictions.
Rolling Stones threaten to sue Trump over music at reelection ralliesDonald Trump has used music by the Rolling Stones during his campaign rallies, most recently playing their songs in Tulsa.
Black Lives Matter: Hundreds march in Berlin against racism
UK theatres, on 'brink of ruin', criticise government reopening plan
COVID-19: Cases hit record high in US as Europe clamps down on partiesThe recent surge in US cases has led some states to tighten restrictions again.
In pictures: the best images from this week's news stories
Can testing and contact tracing prevent a second lockdown?
Europe's week: Germany's EU presidency, COVID-19 and Eurovision
How has Caracalla Dance Theatre influenced culture in the Middle East?Lebanese-born Abdel-Halim Caracalla created the Caracalla Dance Theatre during an era when pursuing a career in the expressive arts was not the norm.
Why is hip-hop bringing change in Tunisia’s Kasserine Mountains?Bordering Algeria, poverty and unemployment in Tunisia’s Kasserine Mountains has gone some way towards nurturing young recruits for extremism. Hip hop dancing, however, has emerged as a new way to potentially combat militant recruitment.
22 police officers injured after lockdown clashes in London
Analysis: Can Europeans be trusted to follow the post-lockdown rules?The question comes after a makeshift rave in Brussels raised eyebrows in Belgium.
Barcelona opera house opens with concert exclusively for plants
Germany: 'Nordadler' becomes third neo-Nazi group banned this year
Barcelona's Liceu opera house reopens for performance to potted plants
Hundreds overlook virus rules to mark France's summer music festival
Kurt Cobain's iconic guitar sells for €5.4 million
The iPhone shortcut recording when you say 'I'm getting pulled over'
World War II singer and 'forces sweetheart' Dame Vera Lynn dies at 103
Analysis: Will coronavirus change weddings for the better?"With a deep recession expected will we think again about the folly of big weddings?" asks Euronews' political editor Darren McCaffrey.
Did Apple break EU competition rules? Bloc launches probes to find out
Smaller artists 'make a city's music scene,' says singer John Legend
Final curtain? How coronavirus might have killed off London's West EndThe show must go on. But what if it can't?
Deaths in police custody in Europe are back in the spotlight
Trianon trauma: Why is the 1920 treaty a national tragedy for Hungary?The fallout from the Treaty of Trianon - signed 100 years ago today - has echoes in current tensions between Hungary and its neighbours, where some two million ethnic Hungarians still live.
Berlin boat party criticised for lack of social distancing
Coronavirus blues: the musicians struggling to make ends meet under lockdown
Playing while under lockdown in Leipzig
Solo for COVID: German bassist Billy Wagner
Virtual reality gallery: Dubai art scene goes digital
Starved for culture, Czechs hold drive-in festival
Rock'n'roll legend Little Richard has died aged 87Little Richard, the self-proclaimed “architect of rock ‘n’ roll” whose piercing wail, pounding piano and towering pompadour irrevocably changed popular music while introducing black R&B to white America, has died Saturday. He was 87.
'Untenable and unrealistic': French plan to reopen schools criticised
Kids choir leaves audience in tears singing 'Stop hurting our planet'Children aged 4-16 appeared on Britain's Got Talent with an 'S.O.S. From the Kids' about climate change.
Singer Idir, an 'icon of Algeria' and Kabyle identity, dead at 70
German party-goers dance the night away under lockdown thanks to 'car-disco'
'Greatest drummer': Afrobeat pioneer Tony Allen dies aged 79"The greatest drummer on Earth has left us," said Red Hot Chili Peppers bassist Flea, paying tribute to Tony Allen, who has died aged 79.
Captain Tom Moore promoted to colonel on 100th birthday
Belgians to receive free masks as part of lockdown exit strategy
Coronavirus: Summer without festivals results in millions in losses
Life after lockdown: Will live music survive a post-coronavirus world?
Creative sector seeks support amid fears over impact of lockdown
Balkan Trafik Festival: Brussels music extravaganza to go ahead online
Syria refugees to face their torturers in German courtWassim Mukdad, 34, will testify before a German court in the trial of Anwar R., a former member of Syria's secret police suspected of overseeing the abuse of detainees at a notorious jail near Damascus known as Al Khatib, or Branch 251.
Gaga, McCartney, Elton John and more offer hope at COVID-19 concert
'One World: Together at Home' raises millions for coronavirus relief
Hans Zimmer composes a soundtrack for the BMW i4, will Tesla catch up?Why cities of the future might be filled with a quiet cacophony of electric vehicles.
Star-studded Together At Home concert kicks off. Read how to watch itAiring tonight, One World: Together At Home will be a music-marathon bringing together some of the world's most famous artists and tv personalities in the fight against coronavirus. Here is when and where to watch it.
Let's party! People attend German concert drive-in cinema style
COVID-19: Spain volunteers use music and dance to cheer up residents
How to stay healthy working from home, according to chiropractors
Watch: Opera singer treats her Paris neighbours to an Easter showAdèle Belmont, who said she recovered from COVID-19, said she wanted to thank neighbours for their support.
Easter: Andrea Bocelli performs in empty Duomo di Milano cathedralAndrea Bocelli sang "Amazing Grace" at an empty Duomo di Milano cathedral on Easter. Milan is the capital of the Italian region most heavily impacted by the coronavirus outbreak.
‘Don’t Stop Me Now’: Lyon choir sings from lockdownMeet the France-based choir who are refusing to let confinement hold them back.
Brazil firefighter lifts spirits through music during the lockdownBrazilians won't want lockdown to stop at this rate.
Meet the people on the frontlines of the coronavirus pandemic
Parisian entertains neighbours with nightly quiz during confinementConfinement in France has seen some neighbours get together after the nightly clapping of healthcare workers.
'Lean on Me' and 'Ain't No Sunshine' singer Bill Withers dies aged 81'Lean on Me' and 'Ain't No Sunshine' singer Bill Withers dies aged 81
Violinist serenades neighbours from balcony amid coronavirus lockdown
Hitting the right note: French orchestra plays on despite lockdown
Too close for concert: Stars play from home to raise coronavirus cash
Grammy award-winning Polish composer Krzysztof Penderecki dies at 86Polish culture "has suffered a great and irreparable loss", the country's culture minister said on Sunday.
How are Europeans coping with coronavirus confinement?
Confinement concerto as isolating musicians play Beethoven from home
Watch: European astronauts offer tips on living in confinement
Saxophonist Manu Dibango dies in France of COVID-19The celebrated saxophonist died in a hospital in Paris.
Opera singer serenades her quarantined father from outside his home
How the power of the creative arts will help solve the climate crisisThese organisations you haven't heard of are bringing music and theatre to the forefront of the climate conversation.
Singer, actor, 'The Gambler': Kenny Rogers dies at 81Actor-singer Kenny Rogers, the smooth, Grammy-winning balladeer who spanned jazz, folk, country and pop died at home of natural causes.
How are local bookshops helping to revive Iraq’s literary community?Despite years of war, censorship and dictatorships in Iraq, authors and intellectuals have determinedly gathered to exchange ideas and share their experiences.
9 places to visit on your cultural trip around Croatia
COVID-19: How and when do European countries plan to ease lockdowns?
Virtual museums and music streams: Culture for coronavirus confinementBecause this quarantine is going to last a while does not mean you should bid culture goodbye: there’s a world of art, history, and music accessible online.
Coldplay’s Chris Martin takes song requests from quarantined fansOne way to escape the boredom of coronavirus induced self-isolation.
This year's Eurovision Song Contest 'cancelled due to COVID-19'Thousands will be heartbroken. Thousands won't care.
Sicily confinement: How one couple coped with life on lockdown
Coronavirus latest: UK closes schools as Italy reports 475 more deaths
Is our addiction to Spotify ruining the planet?We look into whether switching back to CDs and cassette tapes would improve our carbon footprint.
Italians sing, clap, vow to remain united on virus
Harvey Weinstein given 23-year jail term for rape and sexual assaultHarvey Weinstein given 23-year jail term for rape and sexual assault
Bernie Sanders in 2020 is having a rock star moment (literally) ǀ View
Hundreds of thousands protest violence against women in Chile
Women fill streets of world's cities with call for justiceOn International Women's Day, they protested gender violence, inequality and exploitation.
SXSW conference canceled amid heightened coronavirus concernsUp until Friday, SXSW had continued to move forward with its plans, adding speakers as recently as this week.
Viral virus video as Vietnam prevention message proves popular
How can art and alternative therapy help children with health conditions?In 2014, whilst delivering her third child in Egypt, Amal Tolba suffered complications due to medical malpractice.
Whip it! A cracking tradition comes alive at Bavarian contestWhipcracking is a Bavarian tradition that goes back to coachmen who used to announce their arrival in a village with their whip.
La Scala premiers Rossini's Il Turco in Italia
Serbia will plant 1 billion trees in order to reach net zero targetThe founders of an award winning festival want to increase Serbia's forest cover by nearly 50%.
Belgian artists slam Flemish funding cutsThe right-wing Flemish government intends to cut funds for cultural projects by 60%. Minister-president Jan Jambon at the Flemish Parliament explains that the cuts won’t affect everyone: indeed traditional Flemish cultural heritage will receive more money.
Opera singer Placido Domingo apologises after sex harrassment claimsPlacido Domingo's apology came hours before a US opera union found him guilty of "​inappropriate activity, ranging from flirtation to sexual advances".
Outrage after same-sex couple effigy burned at Croatian festival
Trump heaps praise on India's Modi in packed stadium"India will always hold a very special place in our hearts," Trump said.
Unstoppable? Bernie Sanders heads into South Carolina stronger than everAfter winning Nevada, the Vermont senator is riding a wave of votes, delegates and momentum into the next contest.
Carnival kicks off in Rio with traditional Carmelitas street partyThousands of revellers attended the Carmelitas street party during the first day of the Rio Carnival on Friday
In pictures: the best images from this week's news stories
Sochi Winter Arts Festival breaks new boundariesThis year’s Sochi Winter Arts Festival featured a full program under the leadership of Russian violinist and conductor Yuri Bashmet as artistic director.
Greek islands of history and cultureTake century upon century of empires jostling for supremacy at sea and ships sailing into exotic ports fringed by fortresses and temples of stone and set all this against the backdrop of a shimmering blue sea, and you may well start to fall under the eternal spell of the Greek islands.
Mike Bloomberg bets on zigging while other presidential candidates are zaggingA late entrant into the Democratic presidential race, the former New York City mayor is making a billion-dollar bet that the old rules no longer apply.
Is playing video games making climate change worse?
Thousands take part in 'sardines' rally in Rome
Two injured in Moscow church knife attackTwo people were injured in a knife attack in a Moscow church on Sunday.
One dead, four injured in shooting outside Berlin music venueUnknown people opened fire around 22:50 CET on Friday outside the Tempodrom, a Berlin music venue, killing 1 and injuring 4, the police said.
Solar-powered raves on the rise in France as a green way to party
Abu Dhabi celebrates 250 years of Beethoven with the Hamburg Symphony OrchestraThe Hamburg Symphony Orchestra performance brought crowds together in Abu Dhabi to celebrate the 250th birthday of German composer and pianist, Ludwig van Beethoven.
Anoushka Shankar's mesmerising musical journey
Anoushka Shankar's personal journey reflected in her new album
Mayra Andrade puts the spotlight on Cape Verdean music
How to get older workers back into the EU's labour market
EU chief: UK should be ‘more ambitious over post-Brexit trade
Forget politics and bureaucracy. Having a stronger cultural indentity will unite the EU ǀ View
Final Oscars preparations underway before awards night
What stands out after Iowa is Bernie Sanders' limited crossover appealFirst Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
The robot who just conducted a human symphony orchestraDo artifical intelligence and music go together?
TSA destroys prominent Malian musician's custom-made traditional instrument"Would US customs have dared to dismantle a Stradivarius?" said Ballaké Sissoko.
1989 news clip unearthed showing the future of homes in 2020
The band making history by powering an entire show on vegetable oilInspired by Greta Thunberg, this band are set to stage the most sustainable concert ever attempted in the UK.
Scratching music onto X-rays like bootleggers in Soviet RussiaA couple of music enthusiasts have been reviving a technique for scratching music onto X-rays. It was a method used in the Soviet Union to listen to music like jazz and rock and roll which was banned by the government.
Gilles Peterson and Skinny Pelembe – Their '11.59' Defining MomentGilles Peterson and Skinny Pelembe discuss pushing musical boundaries whilst respecting the ways of the past.
With live music and booze, Sanders draws massive crowd to party-like Iowa campaign event
Rijeka marks start of year as European Capital of Culture 2020
Andy Gill of music band Gang of Four dies at 64Gill co-founded the postpunk band with lead singer Jon King in 1976.
What can magic mushrooms teach us about preserving nature?This trippy new London exhibit will spark your fungal fascination.
Der Messias: Robert Wilson stages Mozart's oratorio in Salzburg
Brexit: EU's official anthem Ode to Joy hits No1 on UK download chartA version of 'Ode To Joy', the EU's official anthem, has hit the top of the UK's download chart after also topping Amazon's Best Sellers list and iTunes charts in the UK.
Watch: MEPs sing Auld Lang Syne after giving historic Brexit backing
Mobile phone thief in a cell after poor reception from Dutch policeDutch police say the arrest was made as part of a "targeted action" against pick-pocketing at a gig by Canadian rockers Sum 41.
Holocaust Remembrance Day: how is the Holocaust taught where you live?
Bloomberg addresses anti-Semitic violence, throws shade at Sanders and Trump"Anti-Semitism is hardly the exclusive domain of one political party," the former NYC mayor said, adding "presidential leadership matters.".
Germany bans neo-Nazi group in 'clear message against anti-Semitism'
Germany bans Combat 18 neo-Nazi group
Mountain men in Poland bring in the New Year in full costumeResidents of Milowka disguise themselves as devils, bears and death as they parade through the village.
Singer-songwriter says 'sorry' and dies on stage during performanceDavid Olney, 71, fell silent and dropped his head in the midst of his set at the 30A Songwriters Festival in Santa Rosa Beach on Saturday night.
10 charred bodies found in vehicle in violence-plagued Mexican statePolice made the grisly discovery on a country road in the state of Guerrero after locals saw the vehicle on fire and alerted authorities.
Heavy rain brings flash floods to parts of eastern Australia as bushfires rage onHeavy rainstorms have brought some relief to Australia on Saturday as they soaked the ravaging bushfires, they also led flash flooding.
Brazilian minister sparks outrage after appearing to mimic GoebbelsIn a video, the new culture minister seemed to copy a speech by Hitler's propaganda chief as a Wagner opera played in background.
Anger as Brazil's culture chief borrows from Nazi Joseph GoebbelsBrazil's culture minister spoke about national art in a speech that closely resembled that of Hilter's propaganda chief.
Catalan-Spanish conductor Jordi Savall enthralls UAE audiencesAward-winning Catalan-Spanish conductor and musician Jordi Savall, performed at Abu Dhabi’s Cultural Foundation theatre this month.
How is a Yemeni school using music to help children in wartime?A school in the southwest of Yemen is implementing music lessons, in the hope of easing the stress of children living within the community.
Armed guards, secret location: Inside an illegal marijuana bazaar publicized on InstagramAn NBC News producer gained access to an underground operation in Los Angeles where dealers were selling bulk amounts of bootleg THC vape cartridges.
Vienna Philharmonic marches to its own tune
Carlos Ghosn challenge prompts Yamaha warning on hiding in music cases
Yamaha warns against climbing into instrument cases after Ghosn escapeEarlier reports, which Ghosn has dismissed, said he was carried out of his home in Tokyo in a double bass case.
Experts warn Grindr, other dating apps may pose national security riskNBC News analyzed four popular dating apps, including Tinder and Hinge, finding each collect a range of personal information.
The trendy Tokyo suburbs where two worlds collide
Sultan Qaboos bin Said, who modernized Oman, dies at 79Under the Mideast's longest-ruling monarch, Oman became known as a welcoming tourist destination and a key Mideast interlocutor.
From infotainment to helicopter cabs, the auto industry is flying high at Consumer Electronics ShowBefore you even step inside, one "smart" car will set your seat to the right position, turn on your favorite tunes, and program the GPS for your next destination.
'Green revolutionaries': How Sweden built a generation of Greta Thunbergs
Kyoto geishas pledge to improve their dance and music skillsIn Japan's ancient capital of Kyoto, traditional female entertainers known as geishas have resolved to improve their dance and music skills in the new year.
Trump's former pick to lead FEMA resigns from agencyJeffrey Byard said that he "had the privilege of leading the finest workforce during the most impactful natural disaster period in our nation's history."
Revellers fill Rio streets in unofficial street carnivalWhile the cities government official carnival only opens on January 12, carnival revellers attended more than 20 "blocos" or carnival street parties.
Who was the Iranian 'shadow commander' killed in a U.S. airstrike?The 62-year-old Major General led Iran's elite Quds Force, which had a hand in both fighting the Islamic State and U.S. forces.
Watch: Rome holds special parade to welcome in the new year
How did fugitive Nissan ex-chairman Carlos Ghosn flee Japan for Lebanon?
Watch: Hawaii fireworks mark final global New Year's Eve celebrations
Boozy marathons: can running and drinking alcohol really be healthy?Wine and cheese go together, but wine and running is not such a common pairing. The only way to understand it, is to be part of it.
Call for Sydney New Year's fireworks to be cancelled as wildfires rage
Tom Hanks receives honorary Greek citizenshipThe 63-year-old actor has produced a number of films in the country and often spends his holidays on the Greek island of Antiparos.
8 shot in music video 'ambush' near HoustonInvestigators believe a group of men were shooting the video in a parking lot when gunmen opened fire.
Dubai’s top toursFrom dhow cruises to desert safaris. These are the tours worth booking on your UAE holiday.
Comedy without the clichés: Don Pasquale charms Zurich
Meetup was a darling of the tech industry. But can it survive WeWork?As WeWork seeks to divest its companies, Meetup CEO David Siegel is looking for a new owner who can keep the brand alive.
Tulsi Gabbard banks on billboards, yard signs to get her message outThe Hawaii lawmaker and 2020 Democrat's approach is one of her main ways of reaching voters.
Queen and her heirs bake festive treats togetherBritain's Queen Elizabeth and her heirs spent time baking festive treats together in the run-up to Christmas.
How social media has changed in the past decade, according to its influencers
Instagram stars cut loose, draw criticism in Saudi ArabiaThe P.R. campaign aims to showcase Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman's reforms but also comes amid a sweeping crackdown on political expression.
Romania marks 30 years since 1989 RevolutionRomania marked the 30 years since the Romanian Revolution with several events on Sunday.
Graffiti in Barcelona shows El Clasico rivals kissing
Impeachment supporters sing outside White House
The beat goes on: Wu-Tang Clan reflect on rap, racism and keeping it real.Wu-Tang Clan are one of the most influential hip hop acts of all time. We talk to the music pioneers about their career, politics and why Black Lives matter.
1,500 Russian military students attend Kremlin Cadet BallMoscow's annual cadet ball brought together military school students for a spectacular show filled with imperial-style grandeur
Failure to digitise medical records could be putting lives at riskEuropean healthcare professionals say their field is lagging behind when it comes to digitising and sharing patients’ health information. This could be putting lives at risk.
Riccardo Muti conducts Christmas concert in Italian Senate
What flying a helicopter over London taught me about the film industryEver wondered how they make Marvel movies? I got a birds eye perspective.
Artificial intelligence is writing Beethoven's unfinished symphony
Sharjah Entrepreneurship Festival: Akon & Kanye West to run in US elections?
Jeremy Corbyn to step down as Labour leader after crushing defeat"Labour has to face some hard truths — this was not just about Corbyn but the broader worldview and an economic plan that so many people did not believe."
Bellini's Pirata: a tale of love, betrayal and madness
EU summit climate showdownEurope's new Green Deal faces its first test as EU leaders meet in Brussels with the aim of agreeing to carbon neutrality by 2050, but not every country is on board ahead of talks.
Online posts tied to suspected New Jersey deli shooter pushed anti-Semitic conspiracies
Dubai’s most Instagrammable locationsWith its amazing architecture, colourful street art and plenty of record-breaking attractions, Dubai is a place that’s perfect for selfies
'Getting Brexit done is going to take decades' says Jonathan Coe
The Favourite lives up to its name at European cinema's night of nightsIt was the clear winner at the European Film Awards in Berlin, picking up a total of eight awards, including Best Film and Best Director for Yorgos Lanthimos.
Roxette singer Marie Fredriksson dies aged 61It must have been love, but it's over now.
Apple lands first Golden Globe nominations; Netflix leads fieldStreaming services including Apple TV+, Netflix and Amazon Prime nets many of the nominations for both TV shows and films.
The GOP wall: Why Republicans won't walk away from TrumpAnalysis: Politics and the media have changed since the time a group of GOP lawmakers went to the White House to tell Nixon he was finished.
Konvict to Konstruction: rap legend Akon building green city
Abu Dhabi Youth Hub opens, UAE Youth Minister talks new challenges and initiativesAgainst the UAE capital’s skyline of towering, angular buildings, the newly opened Abu Dhabi Youth Hub stands out.
What’s it like to be a blind voice-over artist? Amal Al Mansouri tells her storyThirty-one-year-old Emirati, Amal Al Mansouri is a struggling artist of a different kind.
A guide to Dubai’s marketsFrom traditional souqs to modern-day artisanal markets, this is where to spend your money while in the UAE
Hungarian rapper calls for climate action in his latest hit
Hundreds rally in Yangon in support of Suu KyiAbout 700 demonstrators rallied in central Yangon to show support for Myanmar's leader Aung San Suu Kyi, as she prepares to defend the country against charges of genocide at the United Nation's highest court.
Cities across world finding unique ways to celebrate ChristmasChristmas festivities officially started in Portugal's capital, Lisbon. The season to be jolly is upon us and cities across the world have turned on their festive lights.
Mexico activists protest violence against women
Business opportunities expanding for Dubai in Africa
Korngold’s mysterious opera “Die Tote Stadt” mixes Hitchcock and Freud
How are Lebanese protesters using art to express their views?Against the backdrop of Lebanon’s political protests, which began in October, a creative and musical art scene emerged.
Musical's cast sings happy birthday to Tina TurnerTurner turned 80 on Tuesday.
'Creative genius': Satirist and director Jonathan Miller dies aged 85Jonathan Miller, satirist and director of opera and theatre, dies aged 85
Improving their mooood? Cows get virtual reality to reduce anxietyThe virtual reality headsets simulate a "unique summer field" environment for the cows in a bid to reduce their anxiety and improve their mood. Do you think it will improve the taste of their milk?
Cara Delevingne and Kate Moss in star-studded campaign to save oceanIn the Project Zero video, celebrities talk about the important role the ocean plays in fighting climate change.
How did Mina Chang get a State Department job in the first place?Chang, who resigned after NBC News revealed holes in her resume, had ties to two State Department officials and a staffer for Rep. Michael McCaul, R-Texas.
Introducing Dubai’s international dining sceneThe UAE is home to people from all around the world, making it the ideal place to sample myriad cuisines
Here’s how tolerance is reshaping mindsets in the MENA regionTolerance holds different meanings for different people.
Coldplay to pause touring, citing environmental reasons
Watch: Youth boxing at Naples church keeps boys from life of crime
Coldplay refuses to announce world tour for environmental reasonsThe British band's refusal to tour shows the music industry is starting to take sustainability seriously,
A million lights illuminate London's Royal Botanical GardensLondon’s Kew Gardens welcomes festive season with dramatic light show
Dubai’s best wildlife experiencesWhere to see the indigenous flora and fauna of the UAE
Japan’s past is kept alive in Tokyo’s Ginza neighbourhood
Venice mayor says flooded city is 'on its knees'St. Mark's Square in Venice was awash with water and closed on Sunday as city authorities prepared for another exceptional high tide just days after devastating flooding.
Watch: Fabulous flamenco as video toasts Spain's universal art form"Flamenco doesn't make distinctions, it distinguishes us," according to a Madrid dance school.
Blockbuster business: "We're building the Disney of the 21st century"Business Planet speaks to the man behind the world's first reader-powered book publisher
From Wagner to Broadway: Terfel takes Sydney Opera by storm
Dubai's eclectic music scene
India's famed camel fair ends on colourful noteThousands of tourists from across the world flocked to Asia's largest camel fair in India's desert state of Rajasthan as the grand event came to a close in on Tuesday (November 12).
Arts play major role in health and well-being, WHO says in new reportCan we dance our way to better health and well-being? The answer is yes, according to a new study released this Monday by the UN's health body.
Japan celebrates New Emperor Naruhito with music and dance
How UAE educators are looking to redefine literacy for childrenConjuring up ideas to engage children with books is what Emirati author and illustrator Maitha Al Khayat has been doing for more than ten years.
'Order!': John Bercow unlikely star of Belgian dance track"John Bercow is probably the most rock-and-roll politician in the whole Brexit saga," Michael Schack, a Belgian DJ and drummer explained.
Watch: Award-winning violin maker made first instrument for his son
Trump might end up surviving impeachment but can he survive the 2020 election?First Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
British student, 21, wants to be youngest to walk solo to South PoleA 21-year-old student from Nottingham University will attempt to beat the record as the youngest person to walk solo to the South Pole.
Streaming Wars, Co-working and Brand Bozoma: Watch on Business Line
Time with the best: Vienna Philharmonic's mastery passed to Peruvian protégés
'We're somewhere between an erotic date night and a sex party'Immersive theatre group House of Kittens has a new show, and it would make a great couples' night out.
Lebanon's PM has quit but some protesters are not done yet | #TheCube
Watch: Models get a taste for the sweet at Paris Chocolate Fair
Greta Thunberg declines award: The movement doesn't need 'more prizes'
Top U.S. music school cancels China tour after South Korean students denied visas
Why the U.K. can't get its act together on Brexit ǀ View
Key West hosts fantasy parade during 10-day costume and mask festivalDisco queens and over-the-top salutes to musical icons entertained revellers during Saturday night's Fantasy Fest Parade, the highlight of Key West's 10-day costuming and masking festival that ends Sunday.
Why are Iranians claiming asylum in Afghanistan?After decades of conflict and instability, around 2.5 million Afghans have sought asylum overseas, many of them in Europe. But the war torn country is also a destination for refugees fleeing neighbouring states, including Pakistan and Iran.
How virtual reality is helping seniors breathe new life into old memoriesNew systems let users reconnect virtually with people, places and events from their youth.
Global artists celebrate musical freedom at the Baku Jazz FestivalAudiences were amazed as musicians who had never met before improvised and jammed together during an eclectic celebration of music
Apple tweaked the iPhone email app — and people are trashing it
The Making of a Global VillageIn January, thousands of citizens of Italy’s Basilicata region gathered in a unique location to celebrate an historic occasion through music — which reverberated around adjacent tuff rock.
Robots and innovative farming methods to future-proof humanityThe innovative solutions also rely on artificial intelligence, which can be used to compose music or drive a game of high tech football
Lebanese cabinet agrees reform list, 2020 budgetLebanese Prime Minister Saad al-Hariri agreed on Sunday a package of reforms to ease an economic crisis that has sparked nationwide protests.
4 Lebanese officials resign amid growing anti-corruption protestsEnding rampant corruption is a central demand of the protestors, who say the country's leaders have used their positions to enrich themselves for decades.
Watch back: Protesters in Lebanon flood streets for fourth dayAnti-government protests went on in Lebanon as the government failed to agree on economic reforms.
EU crunch summit - the stakesThree years on from the vote which shocked Europe and the world. The Union Flag still flies here at the seat of EU power. Three British Prime Ministers have grappled with Brexit, our political editor guides you through the issues.
Tate stages retrospective of South Korean video artist Nam June Paik
Joy Division anniversary provides ironic backdrop to Brexit summit
Journalist's killing fuels ire of Haiti protesters
300,000 mourners pay respects to Karel Gott, 'Sinatra of the East'Czechs bid a final farewell on Friday to singer Karel Gott, standing in line for hours to pay their respects to the man whose popularity in former communist Europe earned him the nickname the “Sinatra of the East”.
Prince's estate says Trump campaign broke pledge by playing 'Purple Rain'In a 2018 letter shared by Prince's estate, the Trump campaign agreed to refrain from using Prince's music at any campaign events.
Scientists win Nobel Prize in Chemistry for lithium-ion batteries
Moviegoers call for Joker 'boycott' over use of Gary Glitter song
Local pets blessed by priest in in Lima, Peru
Legendary Cream drummer Ginger Baker dies at 80Baker wielded his blues power and jazz technique to help break open popular music.
Ginger Baker, drummer of British rock band Cream, dies aged 80His family announced his death from his Twitter account on Sunday saying he "died peacefully in the hospital".
Mexicans sing to pay respects to beloved crooner Jose JosePeople gathered in Mexico City to pay tribute to their beloved native crooner Jose Jose in the best way they knew how — by singing along to his ballads.
Tea and sympathy: Women in Sicily use traditions to brew unity amid migrant crisis"Integration comes through simple gestures, such as sitting next to each other while sharing food and good conversations over a hot cup," said the founder of the group.
Imogen Heap cancels EU leg of tour over 'extreme Brexit uncertainties'The British singer-songwriter said she was "truly gutted" to cancel the EU leg of her tour, which had dates in Dublin, Paris, Berlin and Amsterdam.
Inside Chinese camps thought to be detaining a million Muslims"Our center is to prevent terrorism thoughts from happening," the director of one of the centers tells NBC News.
Azerbaijan's Nasimi Festival is a melting pot of Poetry Arts and Spiri
Rolando Villazón's Wild Western wows Leipzig
Trump's Nickelback meme gets taken off Twitter for copyright violationTrump's Wednesday night tweet riffed on a popular meme where users replace the photograph the band's lead singer holds in a music video.
The 'Kuduro' state of mind
Homeless soprano captures hearts with operatic subway serenade
Sanya - tourist activity hotspot in the South China Sea
Billie Eilish to tackle climate crisis with 2020 green world tourThe internationally acclaimed teen popstar has announced that her 2020 world tour will be eco-friendly.
Pope Francis: Don't sell weapons and turn away refugees fleeing warsThe pope criticised countries that sell weapons but do not accept refugees from conflicts where arms are used.
'SNL' returns for 45th season, targets Trump impeachmentRudy Giuliani, played by Kate McKinnon, comforts Trump on live TV: "Nobody is going to find out about our illegal side dealings with the Ukraine."
El Gouna Film Festival: Palestinian filmmaker Mai Masri shares her experience
Oktoberfest: What's it like to don a dirndl and work as a waitress?Of course, there are times when the wait staff at Oktoberfest have to deal with difficult customers. "I think if you just have good banter, or a 'mouth like a sword' as they say in Bavaria, you can actually get by quite well with that."
Hollywood celebrates 50th anniversary of Beatles' Abbey Road albumA special anniversary edition of the album has been released with new mixes and unreleased session recordings and demos
Chris Wright: Westminster chaos shows us our electoral system is not fit for purpose ǀ View
Boris Johnson flies back to U.K. to face Brexit music
Italy's top court rules assisted suicide not always a crime
How a retired Hungarian man reclaimed his image from memestersAndrás Arató became a laughing stock 10 years ago when pictures of him became widely used in memes. But the newly-baptised "hide the pain Harold" has reclaimed his image.
Watch: Disabled artist dances with the stars in South AfricaMusa Motha's leg was amputated when he was 11-years-old, after being diagnosed with cancer. Now he is a lead dancer in 'Cion: Requiem of Ravel's Bolero.'
Did you miss the Emmy Awards? Here's a look at the best moments.The host-free ceremony largely avoided topical gags, focusing on what one presenter called the 'platinum age' of TV. Here's a look at five key moments.
'Thrones' and 'Veep' eye farewell wins, and other Emmy Awards storylinesIs there more glory in store for HBO's heavyweights? How will the ceremony unfold without a host?
Security experts: Hack of voters' confidence in elections may be biggest threat to 2020"If we keep telling voters that elections are screwed up then they're going to start believing us and stop voting," Ohio's elections chief said.
Matera 2019: dancing in the streets as locals embrace cultural collaborationMatera’s year as European Capital of Culture is drawing to a close. But its legacy will remain thanks to the enthusiastic involvement of local residents.
Masha and the Bear: Russian duo clock up 55 billion views on YouTube
Six months after Christchurch shootings, videos of attack are still on FacebookPlatforms increasingly face a battle with bad actors organizing on forums such as 8chan to circumvent their detection systems.
A Traviata for the 21st Century takes Paris by storm
MSNBC to moderate candidate gun safety forum in Las VegasThe October event will feature the 10 leading Democrats who took part in the September primary debate.
Hungarian arena apologises after blasting Rammstein song at nightYou shook me all night long: People residing near the soon-to-be-completed Puskas Arena in Bupadest's 14th district reported that Rammstein's recently-released 'Deutschland' song could be heard through the facility's sound system on repeat for hours in the night from Monday to Tuesday.
Troubled singer-songwriter Daniel Johnston dies at 58
The Berlin Philharmonic Orchestra opens Bucharest's George Enescu festival
Materadio brings radio broadcasting to the stageAs part of its ongoing celebrations as European Capital of Culture, the Italian city of Matera is to host three days of live programming from state radio channel Rai Radio 3 between 11 and 15 September.
Watch: Statue of singer-songwriter Leonard Cohen unveiled in Vilnius
Apple event: A new iPhone and details on subscriptions servicesWith smartphone sales slowing globally, Apple has begun to emphasize its subscription services — but it also rolled out an iPhone with a dual camera system.
UFC 242 brings fan fervour with Khabib vs. Poirier fight in Abu Dhabi
Paul McCartney is the real "Grandude" of book signingHe may be one of the world's most famous musicians, but Paul McCartney is also just a regular grandfather.
This Dutch company hires people without a cover letter or resumeA Dutch company hires people without a cover letter or resume — all they have to do is put their name on a list to work at the company.
Dale Chihuly on his latest exhibition at Kew GardensOne of the world’s most daring glass artists has taken over London’s Royal Botanic Gardens with an exhibition not to be missed.
The power of music: Juan Diego Flórez gives hope to disadvantaged children in PeruJuan Diego Flórez is proving that music can be a life changer for the poorest and most disadvantaged kids.
Juan Diego Flórez plans an international music academy in Peru
Face-swapping app takes off in China, making AI-powered deepfakes for everyone
161 mph Taycan revealed as Porsche's first electric carFours years on from the Mission E concept, Porsche’s first EV is now ready to go on sale
4chan trolls impersonate Jewish people on social media to spread hateThe troll campaign provides yet another example of how online political discourse can be infiltrated and aggravated by outside groups.
Soap opera? Prague music fans watch Don Giovanni from the bath
The pros and cons of the booming rental fashion industryPeople are starting to rent their clothes instead of buying them. Is there a future for the industry claiming to be the ‘Airbnb of fashion’?
The life-changing magic of tidying up your Netflix queue ǀ View
Brexit by the sea – Tiny Dutch village braces for huge Brexit party"The idea of waving to the Brits and waving back is great and to have different types of music from different European countries. It is amazing idea and we support it," Mayor of Wijk ann See
Opera singers on sexual assault allegations facing Placido Domingo
Listening to opera from a rooftop bathtub: Czech!Czech opera singer Adam Plachetka sang arias from the opera Don Giovanni by Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart on Thursday( August 29) to people lying in bathtubs at the rooftop of Lucerna building in Prague.
This week's best no comments: Film, food fights & the best whistlersHere are some of our best no comment videos from this week.
Behind the scenes of the International City of Gastronomy in Lyon
Kellyanne Conway sings Taylor Swift's own song in rebuke of Equality Act advocacy"You voting for this video means that you want a world where we are all treated equally under the law regardless of who we love — regardless of how we identify," Swift said.
Whistling competition: Japanese blows the audience away in PasadenaA 36-year-old Japanese whistler Akiko Shibata, who performed a whistling medley with a music box and a puppet, to take home the world title
Watch: Mariachis gather in Guadalajara for Mexican music festival
Record breaking heatwave hits UK over holiday weekend
Ex-sheriff Joe Arpaio, pardoned by Trump, wants his old job back"Watch out world! We are back!" Arpaio, 87, says in announcing he is again running for sheriff of Maricopa County, Arizona.
Explainer: The 600-km human chain that helped collapse communism
Calls for 'upskirting' to be made illegal in Germany
Kosky’s Orphée aux enfers: “visual and vocal pyrotechnics” in SalzburgThis year marks the 200th anniversary of composer Jacques Offenbach's birth. To commemorate this, director Barrie Kosky has reinvented the artist's famous operetta - Orphée aux Enfers (Orpheus in the Underworld) - being performed at the Salzburg Festival until the 30th of August.
The concept of democracy in the UK is seriously under threat ǀ View
Stella McCartney and Taylor Swift team upThe pair are launching the range to celebrate the launch of Swift's new album.
Ed Sheeran showcase opens in musician's home county of Suffolk
Watch: Girls and boys march in step as oldest youth guard turns 175
Polish supermarkets introduce 'hours of silence' for autistic peopleA supermarket chain in Poland is set to introduce an initiative across its stores with designated shopping hours favouring conditions for people on the autism spectrum.
Beijing hosts robot extravaganza
YouTube star PewDiePie announces marriage to long-term girlfriend"I'm the happiest I can be," Kjellberg tweeted. "I'm so lucky to share my life with this amazing woman."
Watch: Russia takes first place at International Fireworks Festival
Watch: Kabul museum restores art shattered by Taliban
Watch: Ian McKellen joins Les Mis cast in pub singalongThe thespian, 80, made a blink or you'll miss it appearance in a recent Les Miserables performance in Newcastle.
Inside the secretive media outlet that became one of Trump's biggest supportersStarted almost two decades ago with a stated mission to "provide information to Chinese communities to help immigrants assimilate into American society," The Epoch Times now wields one of the biggest social media followings of any news outlet.
Watch: Fans celebrate 50 years since Woodstock music festival
Woodstock fifty years on: legacy celebrated despite lack of official anniversary eventFifty years ago, the landmark Woodstock Festival was taking place in upstate New York. No official anniversary eventis taking place, but its legacy is commemorated in various ways including a new documentary.
The Edinburgh Fringe is white, middle class and elitist ǀ View
Cure 'em all: Metallica give €250k for children's hospital in RomaniaUS heavy metal band Metallica have donated €250,000 for the construction of a paediatric hospital in Romania.
Astronaut rocks Ibiza with first ever DJ set from Space!
Watch: Woodstock album cover couple still together 50 years on
Opera union launches investigation into Domingo assault allegations
Sziget attendees defend Coca Cola's #LoveIsLove campaign in Hungary
Our best No Comment videos of the week
Sziget music festival in Hungary showcases its green credentials
Khalil Gibran musical The Broken Wings makes regional debut at Lebanon's Beiteddine Art FestivalLebanon’s iconic 19th century palace of Beiteddine, was the setting for the regional debut of The Broken Wings musical at the annual Beiteddine Art Festival.
How is the Beitedinne Art Festival bringing tradition and youth culture together?The Beiteddine Art Festival is one of the most prestigious annual music festivals in the Middle East.
Jordanian community rallies to support local theatre to promote the arts in AmmanA passion for the performing arts, and a desire to bolster his country’s cultural scene, saw Dr. Abdelsalam Qubailat set up the Al Shams Theatre in Amman three years ago.
Fans recreate Beatles' iconic Abbey Road cover shot 50 years onIain MacMillan photographed John, Paul, George and Ringo striding across a zebra crossing while a police officer stopped traffic
Watch: Fan's 'come together' for Abbey Road photo's 50th
Google pledges to make all hardware from recycled materials in 3 yearsThe tech giant is taking a leap of faith into the world of sustainability, with three pledges to integrate ethics into the brand.
Toni Morrison was a freedom fighter who slayed with words ǀ View
Plane carrying members of singer Pink's team crash lands in Denmark
Fact check: Trump suggests video games to blame for mass shootings
R. Kelly charged with engaging in prostitution, soliciting a minor in MinnesotaThe musician already faces multiple federal and state sex crime charges in New York and Illinois.
Dutch band nixes Lebanon gig in solidarity with local artists
Twitch streamer 'Ninja,' one of the biggest names in Fortnite, is abandoning the platformNinja also brings in revenue from his 22 million subscribers on YouTube, where he posts videos recapping livestreams and gaming events.
US rapper A$AP Rocky released from custody until assault trial verdictA Swedish judge has decided to release US rapper A$AP Rocky from custody until the verdict.
Lebanese indie band concert cancelled after church pressureThe Indie rock band "Mashrou' Leila" had their concert at the Byblos International Festival cancelled after pressure from the church.
How a hashtag looks set to offer LGBTI people a #MeToo moment in Poland ǀ View
Hal Prince, famous Broadway director and producer, has diedHal Prince, the famous Broadway musical producer, who was behind "The Phantom of the Opera" and "Cabaret" has died.
Kraftwerk sampling case: EU top court rules on 20-year disputeKraftwerk sampling case: EU top court rules on 20-year dispute over two-second clip
People demand #JusticeforSteve after French festival-goer's body found
How TikTok became the music discovery platform for the smartphone generationTikTok now shows up on YouTube, Spotify and Apple Music, where TikTok-focused playlists have tens of thousands of followers.
Attending a music festival this summer? Read our eco-friendly guide
Why Tim Cook dropped $1 billion on Intel's modem chipsByers Market is a daily newsletter from NBC News senior media reporter Dylan Byers that takes you behind the scenes in Hollywood, Silicon Valley, New York and Washington.
Take an eco-friendly break in Britain's greenest cityEdinburgh was named Britain's greenest city this year this might make it the perfect place for a green getaway.
Gustavo Dudamel electrifies the Rencontres Musicales d'Évian festivalThe inspirational conductor Gustavo Dudamel and the festival's specially-created orchestra gave a passionate performance of Brahms' 4th symphony at the grand finale.
Greta Thunberg and The 1975 release rallying cry for climate rebels
Sweden says government will not get involved in A$AP Rocky case
No charges for man who allegedly harassed ASAP Rocky, Swedish prosecutors sayThe prosecutor's office in Stockholm said the man "is no longer suspected of any crime."
Queen's 'Bohemian Rhapsody' hits 1 billion views on YouTubeQueen's 'Bohemian Rhapsody' hits 1 billion views on YouTube
Robotic bartender serves up cocktails for Prague clubbers
Thousands flock to celebrate 100 years of CitroenPeople gathered in the La Ferté Vidame this weekend to celebrate, watch and show off 100 years of Citroen cars.
Bones exhumed in the Vatican in renewed search for girl missing since 1983Emanuela Orlandi disappeared after she left her family's flat in the Vatican City and headed to a music lesson.
Are eco farm retreats replacing the club scene in Ibiza?We went along to La Granja hotel to learn about why guests leave feeling reconnected to nature.
Vatican recovers bones as bid to solve mystery of missing girl goes onThe remains were first discovered last week in the search for Emanuela Orlandi, a 15-year-old who disappeared after a music lesson.
Moon landing 50th anniversary: The historic mission explained
Feline baffled: 'Cats' cinematic adaptation provokes strong views
How is Iraqi cellist Karim Wasfi using music to fight terrorism?
Ornate floats parade through the streets of Kyoto at Gion FestivalOrnately-decorated floats paraded through Japan's ancient capital Kyoto on Wednesday at the climax of the annual Gion Festival.
The hottest acts of today and the past light up the stage in PortugalEuronews meets the headliners of NOS Alive festival and finds there really is an act for everyone.
Pete the Monkey: A revolutionary eco music festival in FranceEurope's most sustainable music festival takes over Normandy with a fresh, green approach to recycling, water, energy and plastic on site!
Watch: Apollo 11 astronaut speaks on 50th anniversary of launch
Hip-hop festival evacuated as nearby forest fire threatened revellersPolice advised organisers to act after heavy winds threatened to push the blaze closer to the festival site on the island of Pag.
Watch: Underwater music festival fills ocean with sound
Cory Booker aims to give aging prisoners 'a second look'
'Yellow Vests' clash with police in Paris after Bastille Day parade
China's rising tech scene threatens U.S. brain drain as 'sea turtles' return homeSilicon Valley was "a little bit slow for us," said Shenzhen-based entrepreneur Jason Gui, one of millions of Chinese people who were educated in the U.S.
Huge New York power cut leaves Broadway, Times Square in darkA massive power cut crippled the tourist-filled heart of Manhattan for several hours on Saturday, cancelling Broadway shows and halting subway lines.
At the biggest YouTube event of the year, the company's troubles are out of mindOf the more than 20 parents, YouTubers, and YouTube viewers interviewed by NBC News at VidCon, only four said they were aware of the company's controversies from earlier this year.
Vatican mystery over missing girl deepens; bones foundThe mystery of the decades-old disappearance of the daughter of a Vatican employee took yet another twist with the discovery of two sets of bones under a stone manhole.
Recycling fish waste into leatherOn this episode of Inspire Africa, Jerry Bambi works with fishermen, and tells the story of how fish waste is being recycled into leather in Morocco.
R. Kelly's federal charges say he took underage girls over state lines for sexOnce Kelly had convinced victims to be with him they "were not permitted to leave their room" without permission "including to eat or go to the bathroom," one of the indictments says.
First-ever Heavy Metal Knitting World Championship in Finland
Santiago de Cuba: Welcome to Cuba's city with a French touchIn the latest episode of Postcards, we visit Cuba's southeastern Santiago de Cuba Province to celebrate its distinctive and diverse cultural history.
Watch: Music fills the air at the Dubrovnik Summer Festival
The life and death experience of Mozart's Requiem at Festival LyriqueSiobhan Stagg sings soprano in Romeo Castellucci's production of Mozart's Requiem at the Festival Lyrique in Aix-en-Provence
Watch: Heavy Metal Knitting World Championships from Finland
'Tomb of the angel' search for missing teen hits dead end in Vatican"'If you want to find Emanuela, search where the angel looks," a tipster wrote in an anonymous letter, the family's lawyer told NBC News.
Blindly fighting the symptoms of radicalisation in Europe won’t address the causes ǀ View
Attorney who oversaw porn film fraud scheme sentenced to five yearsJohn Steele, 48, who had pled guilty to a litany of charges more two years ago, was also ordered to pay restitution of more than $1.5 million.
Brazil bids farewell to Bossa nova legend Joao Gilberto
Tens of thousands of Estonians perform mass folk singing
Dubai’s top home-grown eats and boutiquesYou’ll find the world’s best-known brands in plentiful supply in the city, but these are the restaurants and shops that are unique to Dubai.
João Gilberto, 'father of bossa nova' dies aged 88
Stevie Wonder says he's getting a kidney transplant"I'm all good," the performer said Saturday during a set in London. "I have a donor, it's all good."
João Gilberto, pioneer of Brazil's bossa nova, dies at 88The Grammy-winning artist was instrumental in popularizing the bossa nova music style around the world.
How to prevent jet lag (so you're not too tired for your trip)Some small adjustments leading up to your trip, on the flight and once you arrive will help prevent the fatigue and irritability that comes with jet lag.
California native chomps down 71 hot dogs to win annual contestFireworks, music and the pursuit of hot dogs marked the 243rd year of independence for the United States
US rapper ASAP Rocky detained in Sweden over alleged assaultSwedish authorities requested ASAP Rocky be detained for an alleged assault after deeming him high risk of escape.
Why was British singer Joss Stone 'deported from Iran'?British soul singer Joss Stone said she was deported from Iran after arriving in the Islamic Republic as part of a worldwide concert tour.
Tried and tested: Was Glastonbury Festival 2019 really plastic-free?I visited the UK's most iconic music festival that decided to ban plastic this year! Did they achieve their goal?
'Search where the angel looks': Vatican to open tombs after tip on teen missing since 1983The family's lawyer received an anonymous tip that Orlandi's remains were buried in the small Teutonic Cemetery.
Rapper A$AP Rocky arrested on suspicion of assault in SwedenIn a video on the rapper's Instagram account, he is seen telling one of the men, "Listen, we don't want to fight y'all. We not trying to go to jail."
Natural Healing Destination: West Bohemian Spa TriangleThis peaceful spa town triad nestled in dense green forest has a rich history dating back hundreds of years.
Protests and music mark opening of new European Parliament
#PositiveNews | Bicycle powered smoothies, eco houses and whale musicThe best ideas, innovations and positive news from around the web this month in sustainability.
Georgia on their minds: why tourists are flocking to the Black SeaThe city of Batumi on Georgia's Black Sea coast is bracing for a tourism boom after winning the 2019 title of "Europe’s Leading Emerging Tourism Destination" at the prestigious World Travel Awards.
Brexit Party MEPs turn their backs as EU anthem is played
Belgium festival cancelled on same day as event | #TheCube"We came in festival clothes and nothing else, so we couldn't go anywhere," a festival goer who travelled from the UK to Belgium told The Cube.
Rapper Stormzy wears Banksy vest, delivers political Glastonbury showStormzy's performance was hailed as a defining moment for British rap.
Albanian mayoral vote unfolds peacefully despite opposition boycottSome abstainers mocked those who were casting a vote with songs from the country's communist past.
Trump plans an elaborate July 4th party in D.C. Critics say spare us another campaign rally.Democrats charge the president is politicizing the celebration of a nonpartisan holiday meant to honor the nation.
Cuba celebrates 500 years of history through its arts
Cuba Travel Diary: Havana celebrates its 500th anniversary
Rising Syrian songwriter-rapper Moh Flow talks challenges for regional artistsSinger-songwriter Moh Flow is hoping to hit the big time with his most recent releases from an upcoming album called Faith.
Star-studded gala wows La Scala!
“The sound of everybody is amazing”, said Plácido Domingo about the exceptional gala at La Scala
Watch: Street opera in Italy challenges stereotypes
Jerusalem's Old City illuminated during Festival of Lights
Trump's high stakes meeting with Chinese leader set to loom over G-20 summitAnalysts warn an escalating U.S.-China trade war could hit the global economy and dent U.S. living standards, particularly among low-income households.
Alanis Morissette on pregnancy at 45: I had a 'freak-out-joy-freak-out moment'In a new interview for Self magazine, the singer-songwriter recounts what it was like to learn she'd be a mom once more.
The Gnaoua Music Festival celebrated centuries of musical tradition
Watch: One country's trash is musical treasure in DRC
Watch: Floating turntable keeps vinyl up to date
Recycled wastes create unique music in RDC
Colombia hoping to be 'Latin American Silicon Valley,' president tells EuronewsColombian President Ivan Duque has been telling creative industry experts, gathered on the French Riveria, how he's focusing on the Orange economy to drive growth and employment.
Aging British rocker Mick Jagger proves he can still strut on stage75 year old Mick Jagger swaggered back to the stage on Friday in his first concert after undergoing heart surgery in April as the Rolling Stones kicked off a delayed North American tour.
Sir Elton John is awarded France's highest civilian award
Colombia hopes to be 'Latin American Silicon Valley,': Ivan DuqueColombia hoping to be 'Latin American Silicon Valley,' president tells Euronews.
Streaming forever changed the music business — and video games are next ǀ View
From Matera to the moon: The Apollo Soundtrack brings a unique moment to life 50 years later
How to make the most of music festivals without harming the planet
Crowds gather at Stonehenge for summer solstice sunrisePeople in the UK on Friday welcomed the summer solstice at Stonehenge.

Around 10,000 people gathered at the ancient stone circles to watch the sun rise on the longest day of the year.
Taylor Swift collaborates with sustainability icon Stella McCartneyWe're hoping the new collection will inspire the singer's young fan base to learn more about sustainable fashion.
Previously lost Freddie Mercury performance released
Watch: Hong Kong protesters 'Do you hear the people sing?'
'Do you hear the people sing?': Hong Kong protesters find their voice
How is Disney’s remake of Aladdin good news for the Middle East?Disney’s live-action remake of Aladdin is amongst the latest additions in Jordan’s contribution to the international film industry.
Salzburg’s ‘Heavenly Voices’ with Cecilia Bartoli and Philippe Jaroussky
YouTube CEO says 'sorry,' but defends hosting videos with homophobic slursYouTube, like Facebook and other online services, is facing growing scrutiny over material that shows violence, promotes hatred or is objectionable in other ways.
'World's biggest' vegan festival attracts thousandsThe gathering in Tel Aviv featured the latest innovations in vegan food, clothing and lifestyle.
Tony Awards 2019 sees repurposed curtains on the red carpetThe 73rd Tony Awards saw a host of extraordinary outfits, but did any steal the show for their sustainable credentials?
In prison letters, 'Whitey' Bulger praised Trump and blasted MuellerThe Boston gangster raved about the president, and railed against ex-special counsel Robert Mueller, in a series of letters to an unlikely pen pal.
Today is World Oceans Day, what are you doing about plastic pollution?
Meet the pianist from Poland who is still playing at 108She broke her hands when she was 80 years old and she was told by doctors that she would never play the piano again.
An all-female road trip around Europe to raise awarenessWe spoke to Julie Brangstrup about her inspiring initiative to help girls across the world.
Meet the D-Day survivor hoping to top Ed Sheeran in the UK charts
The 5 things you need to know about the death of iTunesApple announced it's going to scrap iTunes, its historic media service. What does this mean?
Apple is getting rid of iTunes — what does it mean for your downloads?Technology giant Apple on Monday confirmed recent speculation from key players in the industry that it was going to scrap its historic iTunes service.
RiP: Apple breaks up iTunes into three appsApple founder and CEO Steve Jobs touted the iTunes store as a way forward just as the music industry was beginning to decline due to widespread digital piracy.
Elton John condemns censoring of Rocketman gay scenes in Russia
Listen to music in sustainable style with ‘microbe-grown’ headphones
Top North Korean official reappears in wake of purge reportHe has been North Korea's top nuclear negotiator since Kim Jong Un entered nuclear talks with the U.S. early last year.
Watch: Exhibition transports Londoners to War of the Worlds
Hundreds of children attend the seventh Football for Friendship event
Will Leonardo DiCaprio open his new eco-resort in Belize in 2020?
Michael Bublé: "Be in the moment"With more than 60 million records sold, many awards and now back on stage: the king of swing Michael Bublé is currently on world tour. We met up with the mega star in Birmingham.
How Justin Bieber shut down an Icelandic beauty spotThe Fjaðrárgljúfur canyon in Iceland has been closed to the public after hordes of visitors flocked to the site.
AI just finished Franz Schubert's 'Unfinished Symphony'
Explore Angola: Kizomba music helps renew Angola's cultural identityA music genre that is only a few decades old has captured the hearts of many Angolans. Eduardo Paim, the genre's founder, shares his musical influences and what effect Kizomba has had on his country.
Kizomba Dance - an Angolan celebration!Kizomba is a style of dance which has become really important in Angolan culture in recent decades.

The word "Kizomba" means "celebration" or "party" in Kimbundu, a Bantu language. 

The dance style developed in Angola in the 1980s and 1990s in the region around the capital Luanda, first as a music
Vienna: The unexpectedly green cityVienna has been ranked the most liveable city in the world for the 10th year in a row.
Ex-Georgian president Saakashvili makes triumphant return to Ukraine
ASMR: Discover the brain-tingling solution to anxiety and insomniaWe investigate this booming digital wellness trend.
Akie Abe and Melania Trump enjoy flute concert at Akasaka PalaceMelanie Trump and Akie Abe attended a cultural event at the Akasaka Palace on Sunday during Trump's four-day official visit to Japan.
Piano player, 91, spreads joy at busy station
World’s largest concert promoter says UK festivals to go plastic-freeThe top British festivals and venues leading the way to a more sustainable entertainment industry.
Indonesian martial arts school helps Egyptian women battle harassment
100% recyclable cardboard tents are pitching up at festivalsThe KarTent is a festival-use tent made entirely of cardboard, which is easily recycled instead of adding to the landfill.
Hitting the high notes: Hanging from a crane, pianist plays in the air
How Jennifer Lopez is out to save our world's oceansThe american singer-actress is venturing into the world of sustainability with a new collection that will keep our oceans clean.
Handwritten wills, if real, shed light on Aretha FranklinOne of the wills, none of which have been authenticated, names a surprise father for one of the late singer's sons.
Watch: Skateboards and skipping ropes at Tokyo's Chimera games
Skateboards, yo-yos and skipping ropes are highlighs at Chimera Games
Inside the migrants' jungle in Samos
Iceland's Hatari raises Palestinian flags during Eurovision results
The inescapable global politics of Eurovision 2019 ǀ View
Eurovision 2019: Five highlights from final as the Netherlands wins
Israel set to host Eurovision song contest amid protestsThe music contest distracts from Israel's military occupation of Gaza and the West Bank, Palestinian rights groups say.
Eurovision superfans count down to final contest in Tel Aviv
Peter Hook: 'I think Ian Curtis would be very proud'It has been 40 years since the release of an album considered one of the best of all time. Joy Division's Peter Hook spoke to Euronews about 'Unknown Pleasures', and how the subsequent death of Ian Curtis changed everything.
Can he strike a chord with voters? Ukraine rock star bids to be MP
Cannes Film Festival: A look at the next generation of film directors
Nul points! The best of the worst of Eurovision
How politics is the perennial elephant in the room at EurovisionEurope's simmering tensions have always threatened to boil over at Eurovision and upset the contest's very raison d'être: to unite the continent.
How 'Big Bang Theory' outlived the critics and haters — and got the last laugh ǀ View
Eurovision 2019: Which countries have secured a place in the final?
Watch: Musicians play ice instruments for climate change awareness
Watch: Euronews journalists give their take on Eurovision 2019
Trump revolving door creates 'unprecedented' vacancy mess in governmentThe White House hasn't made nominations for 132 key posts, and those who have been put forward may get stuck in limbo.
Watch: Kurt Cobain's cardigan and Tupac's poetry up for auction
Millennials create own political parties as 373 million Europeans prepare to voteThe European Parliament makes laws that impact the daily lives of around 508 million people in 28 countries.
Brexit was 'mistake of the EU' says top job hopeful Zahradil
Watch back: Who has made it through the first Eurovision semi-final?
Watch again: EU should side with Trump on Iran, says Zahradil
Eurovision Song Contest 2019: Madonna to perform at final
American 'sweetheart' and Hollywood legend Doris Day dies aged 97Doris Day's musical and movie stardom in the 1950s and '60s made her among the best-known screen actresses in history.
Eurovision contestants walk the orange carpet in opening ceremony
All this year's Eurovision entries and their chances of winning
We found love…in Rihanna’s new Fenty fashion lineThe pop superstar is now LVMH's new breakthrough fashion designer.
European elections 2019: What happened this week?
Music to their ears: European leaders enjoy rock star welcome in Sibiu
The two layers of Western society ǀ View
Watch: Artists address climate change and populism at Venice Biennale
Israel runs PR campaign to counter calls for Eurovision boycott
TV for free: Pluto TV offers a wallet-friendly pitch in the Netflix eraThe service leans heavily on the television equivalent of comfort food: throwback sitcoms, vintage movies, reality shows and nature specials.
Spotify EU election playlist: which song was chosen for your country?
Keeping tradition alive in DubaiTourists are flocking to Dubai to experience the traditional Bedouin culture.
Met Gala: Lady Gaga stole the show with her 16 minute entranceThe songstress managed to outshine all other attendees at the most extravagant fashion event of the year.
Our selection of the best vintage shops in ParisThe French capital is a great place to shop for pre-loved clothes that tell a tale.
Diana Ross says she felt 'violated' by TSA agentDiana Ross had performed at New Orleans Jazz & Heritage Festival in Louisiana on Saturday night.
Watch: An intimate portrait into Audrey Hepburn's lifeEuronews speaks with Sean Hepburn Ferrer, who opened a new exhibition in Brussels detailing his famous mother's life.
Watch: Mexico City neighbourhood re-enacts victory for Cinco de Mayo
Plant oil fuel, carpooling and ultra-low emission zones’Companies and initiatives making waves in the green transport sector.
Dubai’s best theme parksFrom roller coasters to waterslides, here’s how to keep the whole family entertained at the theme parks while on a trip to the UAE
Dirty protest? Toilet roll with Maduro’s face for sale onlineFor €8.28 you can buy toilet paper with Nicolas Maduro's face on it.
Dreisig and Beczala, the irresistible couple in “Manon”It is a career jump for Elsa Dreisig. For the first time, the Danish-French soprano and 2016 Operalia-winner is performing in Jules Massenet’s 'Manon' at the Zurich Opera House - together with star tenor Piotr Beczala.
Israel comes to a standstill in memory of the Holocaust
What’s on in May? A curated agenda of exhibitions and experiencesA curated agenda of all the best the Arts have to offer this month.
Road Trip Europe Day 34 Sofia: Bulgarians protest low wages on Labour
European sleepovers: We feel Europe’s pulse ahead of May’s elections
May Day: Paris turns violent but other European marches peaceful
Pink reveals she had a miscarriage at 17: 'You feel like your body hates you'
'Empire' renewed at Fox, Jussie Smollett unlikely to return"At this time there are no plans for the character of Jamal to return to 'Empire,'" Fox Entertainment and 20th Century Fox Television said in a statement.
Brussels dances to the rhythm of the new Balkan music
Leonardo DiCaprio, Emojis and Victorias secret – The best of Earth DayThree of the best eco initiatives launched this Earth Day
Going back in time: Warehouse takes Alzheimer's patients back to 1950s
Prince memoir, 'The Beautiful Ones,' to be released in OctoberPublisher Random House confirmed Monday that "The Beautiful Ones" will combine Prince's unfinished manuscript with rare photos, scrapbooks and lyrics.
Notre Dame choir vows to sing on
Judge refuses to dismiss $10M rape lawsuit against Russell SimmonsThe music mogul did not supply enough evidence to support his claim that the statute of limitations had run out, the judge said.
Marijuana: 420 is a day to celebrate ǀ View
A European democracy festival, how does that work?
Once upon a time in Silicon Valley: How Facebook's open-data nirvana fell apartAnalysis: A lack of rules built upon optimism about the internet and amplified by a growth-at-all costs strategy has given way to scrutiny and skepticism.
Trump's 'Game of Thrones' tweet was like 'five Super Bowl ads' for HBO, say brand experts
How can tech help the arts? Abu Dhabi Culture Summit debates the issueThe third annual Culture Summit was held from 7 to 11 April in Abu Dhabi, gathering industry experts from 90 different counties. The main theme of this year’s event was the discussion of how technology could be a commanding force for the arts.
Bavarian Boogie Ban: Why is there a dancing ban on Good Friday?Dance then, wherever you may be - but be careful if you live in Germany!
Notre Dame beekeeper waits to learn fate of his at least 180,000 bees
Mueller report: No evidence Trump knew about Trump Tower meeting in advanceOnce it became clear the meeting between Donald Trump Jr. and a Russian lawyer would become public knowledge, senior aides scrambled to respond.
Drama and excess in London with a devilishly good 'Faust'
A primitive atoll lost in the shimmering blue sea of CroatiaThis isle has always had a healing power.
Notre Dame beekeeper waits to learn fate of his 18,000 beesNicolas Géant said it had always been his dream to keep bees on the roof of "the most beautiful church in the world."
Terrorist content removal: “United in Action” rather than “United in Grief” ǀ View
Inside a bikini-photo startup's scrappy battle to put Facebook on trialThe David vs. Goliath contest pits a small startup against one of the most powerful technology companies in the world.
The best green music festivals in EuropeOur round-up of small and brilliant eco-friendly festivals across the continent.
Swimwear-clad skiers defy the cold in Siberia to mark end of winterMore than 1,500 Russian skiers and snowboarders have marked the end of winter season by riding the slopes in their swim wear.
"Change yourself to change the world"A descendant of Danish kings from the early Middle Ages, singer-songwriter Stefan Wolffbrandt wants all vehicles on the island of Samso to be electric. Euronews' Hans von der Brelie caught up with him at his eco-friendly home on Samso.
Why Ecuador evicted 'spoiled brat' Assange from embassy
Stomzy cancels Austria gig over 'racial profiling' incident
Feds probe possible racist motivation in church burnings, suspect's link to 'black metal music'"You cannot destroy our faith. We can have church anywhere ... We'll have church in the very parking lot of the building you destroyed."
Sudan's autocratic leader reportedly driven from power after 3 decades
Sudan state TV says armed forces to make important announcement soon
Meet the six-year-old that is one of the world's youngest DJsBetter known as Arch Jnr, the six-year-old is often hired to play at different events, including concerts, private shows and festivals.
Warner Brothers: Trump can't use 'Dark Knight Rises' in campaign videoThe film company confirmed on Tuesday that it will file a copyright infringement suit against the White House.
White cast of Hungarian opera asked to identify as African-AmerianThe Gershwin brothers had stipulated that their Porgy and Bess musical could only ever be performed by an all-black cast.
How to Breathe Yourself Happy?We trial a breathwork session and discover that small changes to our breathing cause seismic changes to our wellbeing.
People from ethnic minorities celebrate traditional festival in Hainan
Stay in a repurposed private plane, yurt or spaceshipGetting down with nature without passing up on life’s little luxuries at Apple Camping, Pembrokeshire, Wales.
Mick Jagger could return back on stageRolling Stones frontman on the mend after undergoing heart surgery
Hélène Grimaud: "the hope is to convey enough emotion to alter time"Muscia meets French pianist Hélène Grimaud as she takes to the stage with Lionel Bringuier and the LA Philharmonic Orchestra at the Walt Disney Concert Hall.
A new eco-friendly one-day festival is happening this month in London
Aretha Franklin documentary has premiere at church where it was filmed"We're at the holiest of holies, right here at the epicenter of where it actually happened," the film's producer said.
Can we make a computer like the human brain?
Mueller report gets a read on 'SNL'
Rolling Stones' tour delayed as Mick Jagger seeks medical treatmentThe band announced on Saturday that 75-year-old Jagger was told by doctors “he cannot go on tour at this time.”
Gaza's 'night disturbers' on Israel border in run-up to 1st anniversary of protestWith loudspeakers blaring patriotic music into the dark, the dusk-till-dawn demonstrations began small and escalated in recent days.
Flamenco legend Sara Baras performs to a sell-out crowd in Abu DhabiSara Baras brought her show “Sombras” to the United Arab Emirates, to celebrate the twentieth anniversary of the founding of her company.
Green festival: partying consciously at Sziget FestivalMore and more festivals are taking sustainability and environmental considerations very seriously so that festival-goers can party it up the green way.
German band Rammstein stirs outrage with Nazi death camp music video
Stunned by war,  Sarajevo's culture scene is reawakening
Controversial copyright reform ignites debate on internet freedomRaw Politics host Tesa Arcilla discusses the controversial copyright reform vote with Tuesday night's panel.
Meet the entrepreneur launching the “Etsy of sustainable fashion”Our interview with Christina Almeida, the business woman launching a marketplace for conscious designers.
Metropolitans | Minsk - a tour of the Belarusian capital
Eco-friendly Spring adventures to book nowThese destinations are actively promoting a sustainable approach to tourism.
Watch: French Spiderman climbs skyscraper to save crumbling Notre-Dame
Controversial European copyright reforms to get final vote todayIt has been lauded by Paul McCartney and criticised by Wyclef Jean - But after two years of wrangling, the European Parliament will vote today on controversial copyright reforms.
Opera singer asked to change pro-EU dress for London performanceAn opera singer has been criticised for being "too provocative" for wearing a pro-EU dress during a performance in London on Saturday
Attending an Ariana Grande concert? Someone may ask if you're registered to vote.Her initiative is called #thankunextgen, a play on her hit song "thank u, next."
Can Steven Spielberg help sell iPhones? Apple is betting on it.
French music duo travel to the Caucasus to soak up musical traditionA French music duo is travelling from France to the Caucasus in a Lada to learn more about the musical traditions of the region.
Watch again: MEPs back controversial copyright reform
Homelessness in Europe - a hidden figure
Netflix's new Mötley Crüe film reveals the consequences of glorifying rock stars
A country that idolizes Clinton and Bush grapples with ghosts of bloody pastThe country is one of the most pro-American places on Earth thanks to a U.S.-led bombing campaign in 1999.
Flowers and music for Madrid commuters to welcome in spring
Sumptuous "La Traviata" charms La Scala with Plácido Domingo and Angel
Why has Trump's administration delayed putting Harriet Tubman on the $20 bill? ǀ ViewAmericans should want to replace President Andrew Jackson, a former slave owner, with the picture of a woman who escaped slavery.
Philadelphia, Pennsylvania: the birthplace of US democracy
Discovering the Martin guitar at America’s 'most eclectic' music shopJoin singer-songwriter Laetitia Shériff as she browses one of the world’s largest collection of vintage Martin guitars, at Vintage Instruments, a legendary Philadelphia music shop known for its extensive collections.
Dick Dale, the king of surf guitar, dies at 81Dale's blistering fast, reverb-heavy assault revolutionized rock guitar and anchored the movie 'Pulp Fiction.'
Reporter's notebook: On the campaign trail with Beto O'RourkeKeeping up with the candidate over 800 miles and 15 stops during his first swing through Iowa.
Meeting with Jean-Michel Cousteau in Petit St. VincentWe checked in the luxury private island resort rebuilding the Caribbean’s coral reefs
What music should you play for your cheeseboard?
New Zealand mosque shootings: what we know
10 things about Beto O'RourkeThe 46-year-old Texas Democrat is going national, jumping into the presidential primary and kicking off his run in first-in-the-nation Iowa.
Pi Day: 7 interesting facts about math's most famous numberEverything you want to know about 3.1415926535...
Ziad al Rahbani tours Europe for first time in 21 yearsEuronews spoke to many of the singer's fans, but he wasn't so keen to talk himself.
Art, culture and epic landscapes: Asheville is North Carolina’s creative haven
Wellness Trend on Trial: Gong BathingWe explore the power of gong bathing for promoting inner peace and healing.
'She said yes': Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez are engagedThe couple, who have been together for two years, showed off the engagement ring on social media Saturday evening.
Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez takes aim at the 'worship' of 'meh'At South by Southwest, the 29-year-old freshman congresswoman drew bigger crowds than any of the half-dozen presidential candidates who came to Austin, too.
'Captain Marvel' is unapologetically cheesy and unsurprisingly badass
'Leaving Neverland' is a long overdue reckoning for Michael Jackson fans ǀ View
Sir Antonio Pappano and Benjamin Bernheim enchant London with Puccini's 'Messa di Gloria'When you hear the name Puccini the first thing you probably think about is opera: but the great Italian composer's first major work was a piece of church music, the "Messa di Gloria". The London Symphony Orchestra recently performed it at the Barbican Centre under the baton of Sir Antonio Pappano.
Who's the most gull-able? Seaside town holds bird-imitating contest
Loving Luanda the way the locals doThe Marginal is Luanda's beautiful promenade and is perhaps the most alluring spot of all. When the midday heat is past and many people head to it and the beach.
R. Kelly denies alleged sexual abuse in interview: 'This is not me'"I didn't do this stuff. This is not me. I'm fighting for my f***ing life," Kelly said in an interview with Gayle King to air in full Wednesday morning.
Watch: This Italian trumpetist duets with 30,000 bees
Best wildlife experiences of the monthLooking for ways to engage with nature this month? These are the best wildlife events, trips and books to have on your radar in March 2019.
Spielberg's spat with Netflix taps into fight over the future of movies
London’s workout scene goes greenTone up while saving the planet and supporting local communities.
The Prodigy's Keith Flint was willing to be dangerous in an era of safe pop ǀ View
Retracing American history in Boston, MassachusettsFrench singer-songwriter Laetitia Shériff is travelling around the US on the trail of musical history and culture. She stopped off in Boston, a city with such an extensive cultural and intellectual tradition that it was once dubbed “the Athens of America”.
Keith Flint, iconic frontman of British band The Prodigy, dead at 49
Brightly coloured and noisy carnival celebrations paraded around Europe
World-famous Rio de Janeiro Carnival kicks off with colourful costumes and samba dancing
Mardi Gras, Australian styleMore than 300,000 revellers on Saturday descended onto Sydney's iconic Oxford Street for the Gay and Lesbian Mardi Gras parade.
Auschwitz survivor's grandson takes German citizenship ahead of Brexit
YouTube to disable comments on most videos including minorsThe announcement comes after major advertisers pulled their ads from the video platform following a viral video that showed comments on some videos sexualized minors.
Streaming services push recorded music business to highest revenue in a decade
Duke and Duchess of Cambridge pull pints in BelfastBritain's Duke and Duchess of Cambridge temporarily took control of the bar on Wednesday while attending an event at a Belfast music venue.
Harlem Globetrotters team up with Philly Pops orchestraThe Harlem Globetrotters have teamed up with the Philly Pops orchestra for a unique performance captured on video.
I knew Orbán when he started his political journey; where it’s taken him terrifies me ǀ View
Why N. Korea's neighbors are relieved Trump walked away from Kim talks"Trump succeeded in setting in place the kind of dynamics between the two — one begging and the other refusing," an adviser to Japan's prime minister said.
From lullabies to lovesongs: The first ever European Union songbookEuropeans are voting on entries for an upcoming songbook that will include the most culturally significant songs from each EU country.
Derya Yildirim & Grup Şimşek perform live at EuronewsDerya Yildirim and Grup Simsek will be visiting Euronews on Friday March 1 at 12pm for a Turkish psychedelic rock concert straight from the 1970s.
Ukraine pulls out of Eurovision Song Contest after political dramaUkraine has confirmed that it will not take part in this year's Eurovision Song Contest after dropping its nominee over contractual disagreements.
Chinese artist creates giant image made up of 80,000 Lego pieces
Japan celebrates plum blossom festival at Kyoto shrineTraditional music, splendid costumes, flowers and green tea: this is how Japan celebrates the plum blossom festival every year at a shrine in Kyoto.
Ukraine drops Eurovision singer Maruv over Russia rowMaruv was selected by a public vote on Saturday to sing at the contest in Israel in May but she refused contractual obligations requiring her not to perform in Russia.
A.I. and world trade take centre stage at 7th World Government Summit
Winter International Arts Festival in Sochi 2019x
Colourful and cosmopolitan: exploring the Bronx, birthplace of hip hop
Spike Lee pays tribute to Prince with Oscars outfitThe director's purple suit, special necklace and specially-made Nikes at the Academy Awards paid tribute to a music legend.
Rami Malek wins the Oscar for Best Actor
Oscars 2019: what you need to know
"Gilets jaunes" take over Starbucks Coffee on Paris' Champs-Elysees
Thousands march across France for the Gilets Jaunes' "Act XV"For the movement's "Act XV", the Gilets Jaunes organised marches in Paris and other cities as well as a picnic at the Chambord castle and a protest at the UN.
R. Kelly has faced sex-abuse allegations before. Will this time be different?The singer went on trial for a similar accusation in the past, but got off scot-free. Experts say this time, the odds may not be in his favor.
Singer R Kelly pleads not guilty to multiple counts of sexual abuseSinger R Kelly, charged with multiple counts of sexual abuse, pleads not guilty
Winter at Tantora: music festival brings Yanni and other stars to Saudi ArabiaThe Winter at Tantora Festival is bringing international music stars to perform at Al-Ula, Saudi Arabia.
Creating music from garbage
Michael Jackson's estate sues HBO for $100M over documentary about alleged sexual abuse
How Ariana Grande beat The Beatles' 55-year chart record ǀ View
Peter Tork of the Monkees dies at 77"There are no words right now...heart broken over the loss of my Monkee brother, Peter Tork," bandmate Micky Dolenz said.
Juan Diego Flórez and Olga Peretyatko: Vienna's tragic loversIt's one of the delights of the bel canto-repertoire: Donizetti's opera “Lucia di Lammermoor”. Laurent Pelly creates a dreamlike and mysterious atmosphere at the Vienna Staatsoper . Olga Peretyatko and Juan Diego Flórez incarnate the tragic lovers in this edition of Musica.
Tesla's latest tech aims to stop dogs suffering in hot carsNo more hot dogs: Hi-tech carmaker Tesla's latest gimmick allows owners to use software to protect their pets
Juan Guaidó and Nicolás Maduro take their rivalry to the stageContested Venezuelan President Nicolás Maduro and Interim President Juan Guaidó are to hold rival music festivals.
Why scientists say experiencing awe can help you live your best lifePsychologists say the emotion of awe plays a big role in our health, happiness and wellbeing. And you don't need to witness a supermoon to experience it.
Why Is This Happening? How to block Big Tech with Kashmir Hill ǀ View
Fashion industry mourns Karl LagerfeldChanel creative director and iconic designer passes away in Paris at 85.
Minnesota nice: visiting Minneapolis, the welcoming city of lakes
Getting to know singer-songwriter Laetitia Shériff
Mickey’s Dining Car: making 'America's best milkshakes' since 1939
Inside Paisley Park, home to Minneapolis native and pop icon: Prince
The Oscars can't seem to make up its mind about anything. Here's a timeline.
After Ryan Adams allegations, will #MeToo finally roil music industry?"I don't know why it took so long to get here, but I think more is very likely to come out," said a music journalist.
'Die Toten Hosen' music documentary premieres at Berlinale festival
Europe's youth walk out of classrooms to demand action on climate change"We feel that actually 2025, 2040, is not a million miles away," said 15-year-old George Bond, a U.K. student who took part in the Fridays For Future school strike.
'It seems like an execution': Officers open fire on man asleep in carPolice said they saw a handgun in the man's lap and that after he woke up he did not respond to repeated commands to put his hands up.
Instagram tourists test patience of Hong Kong locals
Rapper 21 Savage released on bond in immigration caseThe rapper is a U.K. national who "like almost two million of his immigrant child peers, was left without immigration status" as a child with no way to fix it, his lawyers said.
Fashion victims: Bulgaria's textile workers on the poverty line
Katy Perry pulls shoes from stores amidst blackface accusationsThe shoes had many people up in arms on social media.
See what everyone wore to the hottest Grammy after-partiesSkirts and feathers were all the rage!
Sharjah and its spellbinding Light FestivalFrom worldclass pyrotechnics to fairytale characters parading along a lagoon, Euronews discovers a host of spellbinding spectacles during the 9th edition of the Sharjah Light Festival.
Detroit, Michigan: the city with a creative heart and a Motown soul
Detroit, Michigan: from Motown to Jazz townDetroit, Michigan: from Motown to Jazz town
Wild, wacky, wonderful! See the boldest looks from the Grammys red carpetBold red carpet looks
All the must-see looks from the 2019 Grammys red carpetGrammys 2019
Demonstrations in Madrid over plans by PM for Catalan talks
When the FBI shoots someone, including a bystander or hostage, it investigates itselfNew FBI data obtained exclusively by NBC News shows the bureau found fault with the actions of agents 5 times in 228 shooting incidents from 2011 to now.
Lorena Bobbitt's violent act became a joke without focusing on cause, she saysBobbitt, who cut off her husband's penis in 1993, said she had suffered domestic abuse and then was "victimized again by the media" and society.
Wagner’s The Valkyrie debuts in Abu DhabiRichard Wagner’s The Valkyrie was staged in the United Arab Emirates for the very first time. The performance was part of the Abu Dhabi Classics season, an initiative that brings international musical talent to the emirates.
British Council apologises to George Orwell over 1946 rejection letterThe apology comes more than 70 years after the letter was rejected.
Ariana Grande says Grammys producer 'lying' about why she's not performingThe pop star wrote in a Twitter thread that ""i've kept my mouth shut but now you're lying about me."
Rolando Villazón and La Fura dels Baus mix Mozart and science fictionMusica heads to Salzburg for Mozart Week (Mozartwoche), this year under the direction of tenor Rolando Villazón. The festival opened with the spectecular staging of Thamos, staged by the theatre company La Fura dels Baus.
Jay-Z hires lawyer for British rapper 21 Savage in visa caseAtlanta rapper 21 Savage was arrested by US immigration authorities on Sunday over claims he stayed in the country illegally. He remains in custody and faces deportation.
Facebook is creating a dystopian nightmare. We need to wake up ǀ View
Spotify jumps into the podcast industry with two acquisitionsSpotify's entry into the podcast world comes as the company continues to build its business amid competition from Apple and Amazon.
The week that was: challenges posed by our interconnected world ǀ View
Savvy Seattle, Washington: where innovation and nature collide
US rapper 21 Savage arrested for overstayed visa after arrival from UK"ICE will now await the outcome of his case before a federal immigration judge to determine future actions," ICE spokesman Bryan Cox said.
Dancing dragons and lions ring in Lunar New Year in ArgentinaDancing dragons and lions helped ring in a colourful and fun-filled Lunar New Year in Buenos Aires on Saturday.
Pennsylvania’s famous groundhog predicts early springPennsylvania’s famed groundhog, 'Punxsutawney Phil', has predicted that spring will come early this year.
'Fresh Prince' star DJ Jazzy Jeff talks Will Smith & highlights industry problemsDJ Jazzy Jeff, famous for starring in the 90's television series ‘The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air’, came to the United Arab Emirates to perform his latest set.
Turnout low on fourth consecutive week of Brussels climate march12,500 students skipped school on Thursday for the fourth week running to march against climate change.
Michael Jackson's fans don't want to think he hurt kids. But hardly anyone does | View
Thousands of British Jews apply for German nationality as Brexit loomsFor Jews whose families fled Germany to escape the Nazis, the decision has meant re-examining long-held beliefs about the country in order to stay a citizen of the EU.
Grammy-winning R&B singer James Ingram dead at 66He was well-known for his soundtrack work, most notably a duet with Linda Ronstadt on "Somewhere Out There," for the 1986 animated film "An American Tail".
Sand animations tell stories at this festival in RussiaDrawing a line in the sand... then another, and another until an image appears.
How Brexit is pushing British Jews to apply for German citizenship
Breunion Boys: European boyband on a mission to 'win Britain back'This Dutch band is doing its best to prevent Brexit — and doing so in a musical way. The Breunion Boys, who launched their first single 'Britain Come Back' in December, write songs with the hope of preventing Brexit.
Singer’s shock after ‘finding two stowaways’ on her UK-bound tour busAmy Shark was en route from Brussels when the pair were found in the luggage compartment of her tour vehicle.
On the trail of Santa Fe: New Mexico’s cultural melting pot
Matera: Discovering the lessons of history in Europe’s Capital of CultureMatera is a rising star - it’s the 2019 European Capital of Culture. Visiting the southern Italian town still feels very much like discovering something wonderful that few people know about.
Hillary Clinton runs to Puerto Rico, not the White HouseThose close to the former presidential contender are tamping down a report that she might be considering a bid.
Oscar-winning French composer Michel Legrand dies, age 86Oscar-winning French composer Michel Legrand has died at age 86.
Michael Jackson documentary stirs controversy ahead of premiere
Italy's 9,000 year old Matera is European Capital of CultureItaly's 9,000-year-old Matera is European Capital of Culture
Here's how smart toilets of the future could protect your health"Everything these days is connected and smart, but I feel like the bathroom is a very untapped area."
Sitting down with a stalwart of the UK’s ethical fashion arenaOur interview with sustainable fashion pioneer Mark Bloom aka Joe Komodo
2019's Oscars are revenge for the Academy's diversity efforts | View
The Davos Piano man reveals (some of) his secrets
Singer Chris Brown released from custody in ParisUS singer Chris Brown has been released from custody in Paris. The rapper was detained earlier after a woman filed a rape complaint, according to police officials.
EU project aims to preserve cultural opposition to communismIn our Futuris series, we visited an escape room in the Hungarian capital, Budapest. A new European research project is working to preserve historical material related to cultural resistance from the communist regimes in Central and Eastern Europe. But how are they achieving that?
The man with a thousand postersThe man with a thousand posters
360° tour inside Hungarian cultural dissent360° tour inside Hungarian cultural dissent
'Green Book' wins top feature film award from the Producers GuildThe drama-comedy topped nine other movies, including "BlacKkKlansman," "Black Panther" "Bohemian Rhapsody," "Crazy Rich Asians" and "Vice."
Matera, Capital of Culture 2019: watch the opening ceremony
Kustendorf festival celebrates best of independent cinema
No Comments of the weekHere are some of this week's top No Comment videos: We start off with the heart-stopping moment a baby fell out of its car seat in the United States.
Rock and roll nuns hope to make the Pope dance in Panama
Raw Politics: 'Brexit Big Band' turns divorce into musicMatthew Herbert is on an apology tour with his Brexit Big Band to highlight his frustration with the country's infighting.
Mason jars and drama: How an Instagram influencer's event tour captivated the internetCaroline Calloway's tour went viral after its unraveling was documented on Twitter by Kayleigh Donaldson, a journalist in Scotland who warned it was a scam.
K-pop goes bang in Middle EastK-pop goes bang in the Middle East with the visit of 9 member girl group Momoland
Woman who found Jayme Closs feared kidnapper would come after themA criminal complaint outlines horrific details about Jayme's time held captive by the man who allegedly killed her parents.
The film festival halfway up a mountain
Up-beat and down to earth: Cleveland, Ohio
Singer-songwriter Foy Vance meets Frankie Cosmos
The Grog Shop, Cleveland: the ‘place to play’ for up-and-coming bandsWe’ve been travelling across the USA with northern-Irish singer-songwriter Foy Vance to discover some of the country’s best music, cuisine and culture. The journey continued in Cleveland, the city known to many as the 'home of rock'n'roll'.
Muscle Shoals, Alabama: the small town of big musical hitsNestled in the corner of Alabama, Muscle Shoals was originally known for being the location of the Wilson Dam across the Tennessee River… that is until the music industry catapulted this sleepy Alabama town of just over 13,000 inhabitants into the limelight.
Behind the scenes at music legend Rick Hall's FAME Studios
Visiting Muscle Shoals Sound Studio: a place that changed the history
Getting to know singer-songwriter Foy Vance
What is TikTok? How a short-form video app took over the internetThe app, owned by a private company based in China, has gained a sizable user base — and its videos are suddenly all over the internet.
Abu Dhabi’s most historic structure opens to the publicAbu Dhabi’s oldest memorial to its past, Qasr Al Hosn, has permanently opened to the public following 11 years of restoration.
Christian Thielemann and Daniel Froschauer headline the Musikverein in ViennaThe New Year's concert in Vienna is the most watched classic event in the world. Only the greatest maestros get to conduct this legendary concert
Italian band performs in igloo with instruments made of ice
Golden Globes disappoint with upsets like 'Green Book.' Here's the silver lining | View
See which celebrities brought their families to the Golden GlobesThe Golden Globes made for the perfect family outing!
'The Good Place' star Jameela Jamil wore jeans underneath her Golden Globes dressSometimes an "experienced woman" needs to wear jeans to a major awards show.
Christian Bale credits Satan for Dick Cheney inspiration in 'Vice'During his Golden Globes acceptance speech, Christian Bale credits Satan for inspiration on how to play Dick Cheney in "Vice"
Full list of Golden Globes winners
Trump's dystopia is nothing like 'Blade Runner' or 'The Running Man'
The forecast for tech in 2019? 'Cloudy with a good chance of rain'Tech investors, while still optimistic for the long term, are gearing up for a rocky 2019.
Was joining a circus in the Pope’s New Year’s resolutions?Pope Francis impressed everyone on Wednesday (January 2) with his footballball twirling skills, helped by a group of Cuban circus performers who joined him at his weekly general audience in the Vatican.
Search for missing cruise ship entertainer is suspendedArron Hough, 20, went overboard 267 miles off the coast of Puerto Rico on Christmas Day.
Mozart's The Magic Flute enchants ViennaOne of Mozart's most beloved operas - The Magic Flute - brings love, enchantment and comedy to Vienna for the festive season
Gone but not forgotten: A look back at Europeans who died in 2018A look back at some of the notable people that died across Europe this year
Hundreds of rescued migrants spend Christmas at seaRescued migrants en route to Spain have been keeping their Christmas spirits up amid likely difficult conditions at sea.
Watch: The best of Euronews' No Comment videos from 2018From the horrors of war in Syria to tuna tossing in Australia and mocking May to deadly earthquakes in Indonesia, these are the best No Comment videos from 2018.
Watch: Bono and The Edge busk to raise money for homeless in DublinMusicians Bono and The Edge busked in Dublin on Christmas Eve, asking people to donate to a homeless charity.
Rescuers use drones to search for Indonesia tsunami survivors
‘Britain Come Back’: Boy band bidding to block BrexitThe band's creator told Euronews the Breunion Boys plan to tour the UK soon to have a conversation with both Leavers and Remainers about the "special relationship the European Union provides".
U.S. pullout from Syria will be 'trigger that blows up the region'
Has the modern world lost the music of Christmas?With the festive season increasingly commercialised, Euronews looks at the traditional songs of Christmas across Europe to see who's keeping traditional music alive.
Film ‘Industry Village’ in Les Arcs celebrates successFilm ‘Industry Village’ in Les Arcs celebrates success
Have IS really been defeated in Syria? Euronews asks experts
Europe briefing: Six stories to know about todayHere are some of the key European stories to know about today.
'The only thing that should be banned is the FSB,' says Pussy Riot
Tokyo's illuminations draw the crowdsWinter in Japan means warm clothes, hot soup, and light shows. The illuminations are a holiday tradition which run until February.
Frock 'n' roll: Man-free music festival 'violated discrimination laws'
A European Culture Capital’s 21st Century Renaissance
European filmmakers compete for funding in Les Arcs
Scottish artist tackles consumer culture with new exhibit in LondonSurrealist artist and fashion designer Philip Colbert's talks about how his new show that tackles everything from consumer culture, climate change to social media
A decade ago, her mom dreamed she'd win Miss Universe. She just did.
Classical piano soothes retired elephants at Thai sanctuaryA sanctuary in Thailand hopes classical music can 'rehabilitate the souls' of the old, overworked and disabled elephants it cares for.
Putin says rap should be controlled in Russia, not bannedThe Russian president's comments come amid a crackdown on contemporary music that has evoked Soviet-era censorship of the arts.
Kremlin should take the lead on rap music, not shut it down, Putin saysKremlin should take the lead on rap music, not shut it down, Putin says
Kanye says Drake threatened him, Kim Kardashian weighs in on feudKanye's Twitter storm seemed to stem from Drake asking for a clearance from Kanye for his song "Say What's Real."
Musicians & poets celebrate storytelling at UAE Hekayah eventLyrical artists from across the Middle East came together to celebrate music and prose in an event called Hekayah, staged at the New York University in Abu Dhabi on December 5th.
Nancy Pelosi's coat is so popular, the company is bringing back the styleNancy Pelosi's rust-colored coat inspired memes, and the company to reissue the style.
"La Traviata": Juan Diego Flórez and Diana Damrau star in New York"Verdi's "La Traviata" is showing at the Metropolitan Opera in New York: under the musical direction of Yannick Nézet-Séguin and directed by Michael Mayer, Juan Diego Flórez makes his debut as the hapless Alfredo while Diana Damrau plays the tragic heroine Violetta.
Russian rappers defy authorities to challenge society"I fill my eyes with kerosene, let it all burn, let it all burn", sings Nastya Kreslina dousing herself with liquid outside the Russian White House, which houses the country's government, as her co-singer Nikolay Kostylev drops a lit match.
California man treats his neighbours to a dazzling ChistmasEach night, Mike Ziemkowski greets visitors and welcomes them to his Christmas garden with refreshments and cookies.
Unearthing the connection between politics and history | View
Watch: Romania's anti-graft activists mark a year of protest
Andy Serkis reprises Gollum character to mock May's Brexit planAndy Serkis' new Brexit parody is precious...
German town transforms its traffic lights into Elvis lights
Verdi's "Attila" opens La Scala season
Abrunhosa gets spiritual with new duets collectionThe Portuguese singer-songwriter's eighth album pairs him with female partners to sing "songs of love against the hate."
Rapper 2 Milly sues Epic Games for using his dance in 'Fortnite'2 Milly isn't the only one to complain about the video game company.
The Best Christmas MarketsOur round-up of eco-friendly christmas markets promoting sustainable living in Europe to attend this December.
Pete Shelley, lead singer of the Buzzcocks, dies at 63Shelley formed the English rock band with Howard Devoto in 1976.
Everything you need to know about Lyon's Fete des Lumieres
U2 top 2018 Forbes music rich listThe Irish band pip British acts Coldplay and Ed Sheeran
Drake, Ariana Grande top Spotify's year-end chartsDrake fans streamed the artist 8.2 billion times in 2018, earning him the top spot as Spotify's most-streamed artist of the year.
Refugees stranded for 20 years on military base given UK residencyA group of refugee families stranded for two decades on a British military base in Cyprus have been granted permanent residency in the UK
First female Ballon d'Or winner's victory marred by 'twerk' comment
CIMON the European space robot cops an attitude in first test runThere are still a few bugs in the system — among them the 11-pound robot's waspish personality.
World's largest touring Swan Lake arrives in BerlinShanghai Ballet production of the Tchaikovsky classic has 48 swans
Mozzarella with MozartAn Italian farmer believes his buffalo herds make the best cheese of all - thanks to an organic diet, on-demand grooming and a love of Mozart.
Things getting Christmassy at L.A. zoo
Floyd Mayweather Jr., DJ Khaled to pay big penalties in cryptocurrency promotionsThe Securities and Exchange Commission said the charges were the first it has ever brought involving initial coin offerings.
Astonishment as hologram and a live orchestra put Callas back onstageThe operatic soprano, who died in 1977, is brought back to the stage thanks to technology
Revival of Chéreau's legendary "Elektra" at La ScalaThe opera house revived the famous production to mark the fifth anniversary of the director's death.
Jamaica's reggae music inscribed on Unesco's World Heritage List
Snoop Dogg thanks himself after receiving Hollywood starAs Snoop Dogg received his long-awaited star on Hollywood Boulevard, he thanked someone very special for his success — himself.
Pusha-T blames Drake for brawl that left three concertgoers hospitalizedThere's been no shortage of bad blood between the rappers, who have released several songs taking aim at one another over the last few years.
Disco soup served up to Agriculture ministersEU Agriculture Ministers have been treated to a Disco Soup - a culinary and musical protest outside the Council in Brussels. Environmentalists are aiming to draw attention to the reform of the Common Agricultural Policy, and are calling for it to be fair, green and healthy.
Maltese Marvel: Valletta shows off its cultural sideIn this episode of Go Europe we take you to the Maltese port of Valletta, European Capital of Culture 2018.
European shares bounce back from Brexit bruising
Louvre Abu Dhabi celebrates one year, but what’s next?The Louvre Abu Dhabi is celebrating its one year anniversary.
Taiwanese puppeteer fights to rescue declining artAn 87-year-old man teaches puppetry to prevent the ancient art from dying.
'Concert for Peace': Vienna Philharmonic and pianist Yuja Wang mark 100 years since end of Great WarIn this Musica, Euronews' Katharina Rabillon goes behind the scenes at a 'Concert for Peace' held to commemorate 100 years since the end WW1 at the Royal Opera House at the Palace of Versailles.
John Lewis Christmas ad launchedJohn Lewis & Partners are relying on singer Elton John to boost sales as the retailer launches its annual festive advertising campaign
Tikopia: take a step inside a remote civilizationA documentary about a 3,000-year-old civilization.
Japanese man 'marries' virtual reality character
Watch: Russian rock music fan auctions skin tattooed with autographsRock music fan Yuri Galaktionov wants his skin to be auctioned off after he dies.
Cypriot carnival bans costumes inspired by Netflix series 'Money Heist
Woman at War wins LUX Film prizeWoman at War wins LUX Film prize
Baku celebrates 5th International Theatre ConferenceTheatre experts from across the world gather in Azerbaijan's capital to share knowledge and enjoy a rich programme of music, art and performance.
Start-ups take the Euronews pitch challenge at Web SummitStart-ups take the Euronews pitch challenge at Web Summit
Los Angeles topples its Christopher Columbus statue
California fires seen from space show massive scale of destruction
What does the Armistice centenary mean to Europeans?
Trump says California gunman was 'a very sick puppy'US President Donald Trump has said the gunman who killed 12 people in
a South California bar this week was a "very, very sick guy"
Three fine movies compete for Lux PrizeThe winner will be announced from the finalists next week in the 11th year of the prize, awarded by the European Parliament to reward movies that deal with European integration, and how the continent really is, today.
How do you explain World War One to children?
Witnesses recall moment of California shootingWitnesses have recalled the moment that a gunman opened fire in a California bar on Wednesday night, killing 12 people and sending hundreds fleeing in terror.
IMMERSIVE STORY: Moscow's Metro aka the 'subterranean palace' in 360
Children from poorer families less likely to play instruments — studyChildren from poorer families less likely to play instruments — study
Radio City Christmas Spectacular returns to New York CityBlessing of the animals and new details revealed for annual Radio City Christmas Spectacular
The Spice Girls reunion tour is finally happening but without Posh
W.W.W. inventor Berners-Lee calls for net access for all at Web Summit
Glasses that give your eyes superpowersAn Italian company is developing augmented reality glasses that it says will give humans superpowers
Emmental beats: Swiss researchers are playing hip-hop to cheeseEmmental beats: Swiss researchers are playing hip-hop to cheese
Famed trumpeter Roy Hargrove dies at 49Although his output as a recording artist in his own right had come to a halt in the 2010s, Hargrove continued to be a prolific live performer through the end of his life.
Queen biopic 'Bohemian Rhapsody' has no idea what made Freddie Mercury
Two people stabbed at Sony's London headquartersMetropolitan Police say one person has been arrested.
Two stabbed and one arrested at incident at London's Sony HQAn evacuation of the building has taken place as a precaution
French-Canadian singer Garou talks fame, future and The VoiceGarou, one of the most successful recording artists in the world, recently made his debut in the Middle East as part of his 20 Year Jubilee Tour.
Bahrain Jazz Fest promotes popular music with a regional twistThe second edition of the Bahrain Jazz Festival, held on October 26th in the capital Manama, brought together musicians and jazz fans from across the region to celebrate the 100-year-old American music genre.
Apple sees clouds on horizon despite record resultsThe tech giant has posted record-breaking results, but warnings over sales sent shares tumbling.
Technology to help stroke survivors recover
Sonya Yoncheva's "Medea" casts her spell on BerlinIn her 50th role, the Bulgarian soprano unites with Daniel Barenboim in an unforgettable opera.
Sonya Yoncheva's passion for her heroinesThe Bulgarian soprano has played a panoply of strong women in her operas. She tells "Musica" what she likes so much about them.
"Moria is worse than war": Children on life in a refugee camp | View
Pope Francis can help solve mystery of girl's disappearance, brother saysOver the years, her case has been linked to everything from the plot to kill St. John Paul II to the Vatican bank's financial scandal.
Agenda: what’s on in November?Events promoting animal welfare and sustainable living in Europe.
UEFA investigates Athens stadium after fan video shows movementThe Union of European Football Associations (UEFA) are investigating over fears Athens Olympic ‘Spyros Louis’ Stadium is moving more than it should.
Eating pizza under the shelling: the conflict in Ukraine goes on
Late Registration: Kanye West says he's 'distancing himself from politics'The music mogul says his "eyes are now wide open" and he's "been used to spread messaged I don't believe in."
Bones found near Vatican Embassy revive 1983 cold caseThe disappearance of 15-year-old Emanuela Orlandi has bedeviled investigators for decades.
Donald and Melania Trump hand out Halloween sweets to children
'I'm not OK': Michael Bublé opens up about his son's cancer battleThe singer talked about his family's difficult journey in an episode of "Carpool Karaoke" with James Corden.
What is the AR-15 rifle used in the Pittsburgh shooting?
Music Industry: David Guetta releases new album "7"
The last piano maker in Australia just made historyPianos have had a standard 88 keys since 1880. The only piano maker in Australia has completed one with 108 keys.
Two convicted in teen's deadly allergic reaction to takeoutMegan Lee died two days after eating takeout from an Indian restaurant in England that contained peanut protein.
Nothing compares to Islam: Sinéad O'Connor becomes a MuslimNothing compares to Islam: Sinéad O'Connor becomes a Muslim
Garou makes his debut in the Middle EastGarou, one of the most successful French-Canadian recording artists in the world, is making his debut in the Middle East as part of his 20 Year Jubilee Tour.
A 'brain tingle' might be able to put you in a better mood
YouTube CEO calls on creators to rally against E.U. copyright legislationWojcicki urged YouTubers to use the hashtag "#SaveYourInternet" in social-media posts to express opposition to the EU directive.
Baku's Jazz Festival brings sparks to the 'Land of Fire'The festival continues to grow in stature with another rich crop of famous names and names to watch.
Watch: Dubai ExpoLight showA massive light show and festive activities were held in downtown Dubai to celebrate the two-year countdown of the 2020 Expo Dubai Saturday night.
How is the UK helping to accelerate Lebanese tech startups?The UK Lebanon Tech Hub (UKLTH) is an international programme supporting the growth of Lebanon’s knowledge economy.
Opera star Juan Diego Flórez returns to his roots in Latin AmericaThe celebrated Peruvian tenor has picked up his guitar again to sing classic songs from his childhood.
Juan Diego Flórez: What happens when an opera star goes onstage?In an exclusive Musica interview the Peruvian tenor Juan Diego Flórez talks about his feelings.
The Science of sleepHow sleep can improve your health and be your best immunity boost this winter
#Masaktach, how the Moroccan #MeToo began
Five stories from around Europe to know about todayHere is our choice of stories from around Europe today, Wednesday, October 17.
Tech figureheads lead tributes to Microsoft co-founder Paul Allen | The CubeMicrosoft co-founder Paul Allen has died of cancer aged 65
Salisbury church concert strikes wrong noteA classical music concert featuring the work of famous Russian composers wouldn’t normally cause controversy ..... except when it’s in the English city of Salisbury and is titled 'From Russia With Love’
Milan: 'Inside Magritte' exhibition
Inside the first underwater lounge"This bay is made of 19 coats of glass and it's 35 centimeters thick"
Lindsey Buckingham sues Fleetwood Mac"I remain deeply surprised and saddened, as this decision ends the beautiful 43-year legacy we built together," Buckingham said.
Athens: Richard Bellia photography exhibition of music
Fyre Festival organizer sentenced to 6 years on fraud chargesMcFarland pleaded guilty in July to wire fraud charges related to his failed April 2017 music festival in the Bahamas.
Chess giants lock horns in Georgia for 43rd. OlympiadThe city of Batumi was the arena for merciless combat between the world's great players.
Trump calls Kanye a 'very different kind of guy' ahead of W.H. meetingIn a 45-minute interview with "Fox and Friends," Trump discussed a wide range of topics, including Attorney General Jeff Sessions.
Without or without EU - Bono in BrusselsBono, U2 rockstar met the president of the European parliament Antonio Tajani and EU Council President Donald Tusk in Brussels, making the Bubble a place where art and politics collide.
Lights, camera, political action: Midterms bring out the Hollywood heavyweightsSince Trump became president, Hollywood stars have shown far more interest in using their power to effect political change.
Janet Jackson, Def Leppard among 2019 Rock & Roll Hall of Fame nominees
Taylor Swift's dive into political waters brings out the lovers and hatersSwift had been famously quiet on politics before this endorsement.
Facebook's new video chat device met with privacy concernsOne prominent tech journalist likened the new products to the "Telescreen" from George Orwell's "1984."
Taylor Swift breaks political silence, endorses Democrats
Spanish opera singer Montserrat Caballe dies at 85King Felipe VI tweeted that Caballe was "the great lady of opera, legend of universal culture, the best of the best."
Egyptian actress Yousra reveals the most important lesson in her careerAward-winning Egyptian actress Yousra has more than 80 film and television credits to her name.
Top innovators talk creativity and change in Romania
Donna Strickland's long journey from laser jock to Nobel Prize winnerThe newly minted Nobel laureate says progress is being made with the representation of women in science.
Barbara Hannigan triumphs in new opera "Berenice" in ParisThe Canadian soprano excels in a role written for her.
Barbara Hannigan soars again with another contemporary music firstThe "muse" of several contemporary composers has once again brought a brand-new work to the stage, with Michael Jarrell's opera Bérénice" in Paris.
Azerbaijan's new Nasimi Festival honours Sufi iconImadeddin Nasimi's guiding principles of tolerance and multiculturalism will guide event's blend of words, art and music over the coming years, say organisers.
Music an affair of the heart for Salvador SobralThe 2017 eurovison winner is back after a heart transplant and a gruelling brush with fame, doing what he loves - making music.
Hatha, Vinyasa, BikramWhat type of yoga fits your personality and fitness level?
'You're missing your soul mate': Survivors grieve year after Vegas massacreOne year later, survivors and family members of the victims of the massacre at the Route 91 Harvest country music festival on Oct.1 are still healing.
Kanye West announces he is changing his nameThe US rapper and husband of reality star Kim Kardashian has announced he is changing his stage name to a word commonly used in the Bible.
Photographer Semra Sevin on the power of beautySemra underlines the concept of diversity, and her exploration translates into profound studied subjects, deep meditation and pompous photography installations
The Buttshakers perform in Euronews' studioFollowing in the footsteps of the "Legendary Tigerman" and "The Gift", French band "The Buttshakers will perform live in Euronews' studio
Kyrgyz singer recieves death threats for showing bra in music videoIn the video, singer Zere appears in a purple bra and calls for a woman's right to her own opinion to be respected
French rapper investigated for call to 'hang white people'Little-known French rapper Nick Conrad has released a song called "Hang the whites". The video has been removed from YouTube and authorities are now investigating for incitement to racial hatred.
Watch: Construction workers use drums to de-stress in ChileThe event called the "Drums of Soul", aimed to provide the construction workers with a reprieve, allowing them to relax.
Watch: Chilean construction workers play drums to avoid stress at their workplaceRather than their usual bolting, hammering and welding, construction workers in Santiago, Chile on Wednesday (September 26) banged on a different tool for an innovative reason - they pounded on drums to destress.
Raw Politics: Brussels honours slain British MP Jo Cox by naming a square after herRaw Politics: Brussels honours slain British MP Jo Cox by naming a square after her
Passengers delayed at Geneva airport treated to impromptu concertPhotographer Pascal Britz who filmed the performance, wrote on his Facebook page: “This is what happens when classical musicians wait for a delayed flight at 10:00 pm.”
Amazon makes (micro)waves with Alexa-infused productsApple rolled out new iPhones at a flashy event, but Amazon's low key consumer products could herald a new era of voice technology.
Downtown Bucharest fountains reopen with impressive multimedia showThe 17 water fountains in Unirii Square in downtown Bucharest reopened on Thursday evening, September 20, with a concert of the Bucharest Symphonic Orchestra followed by a show of music and lights.
2018 World Judo Championships: Japan's Abe siblings make judo history with gold titles on same dayOn the second day of the 2018 World Judo Championships in Baku, Uta Abe and her older brother Hifumi Abe, the reigning world champion at -66kg, were the talk of the judo world after they made Judo history by becoming the first brother and sister duo to take world titles on the same day.
Amazon launches Alexa-enabled microwave, clock and moreThe event marked the most significant move yet by Amazon to become an industry leader in smart-home technology.
Octopuses become lovestruck after researchers give them ecstacy
Violin virtuoso Leonidas Kavakos electrifies with Stravinsky concertoThe Greek master dazzles alongside the Luxembourg Philharmonic.
Leonidas Kavakos talks about his swooning for StradivariusThe Greek virtuoso owns one of the pecious instruments, but it was only following years of separation after a brief fling with it near the start of his career...
Turning back timeRussian couple transform vinyl records into clocks
The arty hideaway in the jungle you can stay atWe tried Diyabubula, a luxury lodge blending design and nature in Sri Lanka’s wilderness
Middle East musicians send united message of peace with new albumMiddle Eastern musicians send message of peace with cross-regional collaboration.
Theresa May appeals to EU leaders over 'unacceptable' Brexit demandsThe UK prime minister has appealed to EU leaders meeting in the Austrian city to drop “unacceptable” Brexit demands, as pressure intensifies to reach a deal.
Krasnoyarsk: an old city whose future will be defined by its youth
Chef tries smoking lobsters with marijuana before cooking them, says it's more humane
US actor Jack Black receives star on Hollywood Walk of Fame'Kung Fu Panda' and 'Jumanji' actor Jack Black jokingly announced his retirement on Tuesday (September 18) as he received a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame.
Underwater crystal artIsraeli artist Sigalit Landau has created a collection of "frozen" sculptures using the high salinity of the Dead Sea.
Japanese billionaire Yusaku Maezawa to become first space tourist
Emmy Awar - All the latest from Hollywood's star studded TV award showThe Emmy Awards - Game of Thrones and The Crown win big in Netflix vs HBO showdown between traditional TV and streaming services.
Belgian court refuses Spanish extradition request for rapper Valtonyc
Mexico City's mariachi district rocked by shootingA popular tourist area of Mexico City has been rocked by a gunfight that left at least five people dead,
Turkey's Erdogan builds more prisons as post-coup purge persistsA purge against thousands of dissidents and alleged terrorists has filled Turkey's prisons. Now President Erdogan wants to build more.
Three shot dead in Mexico City tourist hotspot, 'mariachi' gunmen fleePolice said they were chasing three men dressed as mariachi musicians who fled on motorbikes from Plaza Garibaldi, a major tourist destination.
On the trail of Moldovan wineIt's cheap, it's cheerful and it's good.
As Brexit looms, musicians fear repercussions | View
EU Parliament approves controversial copyright law
Homo Faber Exhibit: Celebrates European CraftAs technology moves towards Artificial intelligence, the stuff of dreams remains analogue. At least that’s according to founders of Homo Faber.
Green light for copyright reform
Watch: North Korea marks 70th founding anniversary with massive military paradeNorth Korea marked the 70th anniversary of its founding on Sunday (September 9) morning with a dramatic military parade, floats, and musical performances.
As Israel moves right, young American Jews target Birthright tours in protestAn American Jewish anti-occupation group, IfNotNow, is protesting tours that they say ignore Israel's occupation of Palestinian territories.
Rap singer Mac Miller dies of suspected overdoseThe star dated fellow singer Ariana Grande for two years but the couple separated earlier this year.
Rapper Mac Miller found dead in California homeThe 26-year-old Pittsburgh product had long rapped about his battles with addiction, but was on a career upswing with a new album.
The salty sculptures of the Dead Sea
5 stylish weekend breaksFrom the Scandi-cool labels of Stockholm to Ghent’s vintage treasure troves, here are five stylish weekend breaks.
Watch: Donald Tusk just came out with an action-movie style trailerThe video, with dramatic music, highlights what's to come this autumn.
Domingo honours Zarzuela traditionThe Spanish singing style has its own special category at the great singer's Operalia competition.
Dolores O'Riordan's death deemed a ‘tragic accident’The official cause of death was ruled drowning due to an excessive alcohol consumption.
Moscow has a dig at May's movesMoscow has a dig at May's moves
Ukrainian Fashion Week: women designersSince the 2014 revolution, a new generation of women designers came forward.
Ukraine's fashion identity got revivedFashion has had its own revolution in Ukraine in the last few years.
Ballerina tutu emerges as dazzling art from Dead SeaA ballerina's tutu, submerged in the Dead Sea and "frozen" by accumulated layers of salt into a 200 kg (440 lb) crystal-like sculpture, will soon go on international display, part of a unique artistic project at the lowest point on the planet.
Exhibition of Russian-French modernist painter Marc Chagall opens in ItalyThe Ragione Palace in the Italian city of Mantua has put on an unusual display of the work of Russian-French modernist painter Marc Chagall.
Nike takes heat for new Kaepernick ad
"Anti-racism" concert draws 65,000 in Chemnitz, Germany
Fake bomb uncovered at Spanish second-hand bookstoreElena González never expected that a recent sort through of stock at her second-hand bookstore in western Spain would lead to a call to bomb disposal experts.
Israel's public broadcaster apologises for playing music by Wagner
515,000 kids face school closures after U.S. axes Palestinian funding"We want peace; we don't like blood. But I want to ask you a question — if there is no hope, what do you think will happen?"
Belgian courts to rule on Spanish rapper's extraditionOn September 17, Belgian judges will rule on whether the controversial Spanish rapper Valtonyc may be extradited back to his native Spain, where he has been sentenced to three and a half years in prison for "glorifying terrorism".
Blues and gospel diva Liz McComb explores the world of symphony orchestraTo commemorate that slavery started around 400 years ago in the USA, blues and gospel diva Liz McComb wants to bring together the musical heritage of her ancestors, like blues, gospel and jazz, and blend it with that of classical music, a music genre rooted in white European culture.
No Comment of the Week
Sweden hosts 'man-free' festival
Final farewell for Aretha FranklinFinal farewell for "Queen of Soul" Aretha Franklin
Watch: Prince Harry warms up vocal chords at Hamilton musical showRoyal couple Harry and Megan attended the charity performance on August 29.
Lack of gender equality at 75th Venice Film Festival
Netflix has six films in this year's Venice Film Festival
Ex-footballer celebrates number 1 with singles chart bum tattooFormer footballer, comedian and musician Mads Hansen has celebrated scooping a number one summer hit by having his bum inked — with a Spotify singles chart.
London stages Notting Hill Carnival, Europe's biggest street partySteel drum bands and dance troupes followed elaborately decorated floats, as they have done since it first began in the 1960s.
Watch: Orchestra players perform on waterThe Karelian State Philharmonic Orchestra performed on-board a boat at an abandoned marble quarry.
Japanese performer rocks out to win air guitar world championshipAir guitar enthusiasts gathered on Friday (August 24) in Oulu in north-western Finland to compete at mastering their imaginary electric guitars, pursuing the title of world champion in their bewildering passion.
Plastic straws? Cigarette butts are the worst ocean pollutants
Red Square music and dance spectacularMilitary bands from all over the world performed in Moscow's Red Square on Friday night as part of the annual Spasskaya Tower festival
Japan takes air guitar titleA Japanese woman has been named as the world's greatest air guitarist at the 23rd annual contest in Finland
Swiss festival alerts police after 28 Burundian artists ‘vanish’A Swiss festival has called the police after 28 Burundian artists, who were scheduled to perform at the event this month, gradually disappeared without a trace.
Claudio Monteverdi's Baroque masterpiece explores sexual politicsClaudio Monterverdi's Baroque masterpiece  L'incoronazione di Poppea explores sexual politics and naked ambition, starring soprano Sonya Yoncheva in the title role and Kate Lindsey as Emperor Nero, at the Salzburg Festival.
Steven Tyler demands Trump stop playing Aerosmith songs at ralliesTyler's attorney contends that playing an Aerosmith song in a public arena gives the false impression that Tyler is endorsing Trump's presidency.
Watch: Louis Armstrong Stadium opens to the sound of jazzThe rebuilt stadium is in the Billie Jean King National Tennis Center, which hosts the annual US Open Tennis Tournament.
Allegations against Asia Argento show how stereotypes harm male victims | View
Hillary Clinton steps back into the fray to fundraise for Democrats this fallThe 2016 presidential nominee will headline events in California, Illinois and New York.
Meet Sammy: The 22-year-old who looks like an old manWhat's it like to be one of 100 people in the world who suffer from a rare rapid-ageing condition? Sammy Basso shares his experiences with Euronews.
Nashville on edge as police hunt 'cold-blooded' murder suspectsAuthorities said the pair may be linked to a string of recent crimes, including four attempted robberies and the killing of a man walking to a bus stop.
Watch: Meet the revellers at Budapest's Sziget FestivalThousands of young people from around the world have been gathering in Sziget for one of Europe's biggest music festivals.
Celebrity voice coach and producer Oussama Rahbani talks fame and family in BaalbeckA member of one the most celebrated families on the Middle East’s cultural scene, Oussama Rahbani, has composed countless scores and chart-topping songs.
His family has played a major role in the development of the region's theatrical scene since the 1950’s.
Lebanese comedian Georges Khabbaz sends message of unity at Baalbeck International FestivalThe Baalbeck International Festival, one of Lebanon’s most popular and acclaimed cultural events, kicked off on July 8th and will run until August 18th.
Aretha Franklin was a resounding symbol of the Obama era
A far-right party looks to topple a century of Swedish socialismA party with its roots in neo-Nazism and white nationalism may be on the verge of an election victory.
Aretha Franklin, Queen of Rock! | View
This is the moment Aretha Franklin became the 'Queen of Soul'
Aretha Franklin's contributions to civil rights movement remembered
Fast news: The week in a minute
Aretha Franklin was the queen of every musical genre she tried
Aretha Franklin tributes: 'A blow for everyone who loves real music'
Aretha Franklin dies at her home in Detroit aged 76
Watch: Panic as 300 injured in Vigo platform collapse
Europe briefing: 5 stories to know about today
I was a violent white supremacist. I found a way out | View
A closed book? Literary festival hits out over UK’s visa rulesForeign invitees to the world’s biggest literary festival have been ‘humiliated’ in trying to get clearance from British authorities to attend, it’s been claimed.
Barber's mysterious "Vanessa" enthrals at Glyndebourne
Keith Warner's special bond with "Vanessa"
Celebrating the Gabala Music Festival in AzerbaijanEuronews speaks to some of the star performers at the traditional music festival, marking its 10th anniversary, taking place in the Caucasus Mountains.
Israeli 'MultiPiano' virtuosi play with 5 hands on two pianosThe impressive group dazzled audiences at the Gabala Music Festival in Azerbaijan, which has been celebrating its 10th anniversary.
Tomorrowland booms the electronic dance music scene in Abu DhabiTomorrowland, an electronic dance music festival that started in Europe thirteen years ago, attracted fans from around the world to Abu Dhabi on Saturday, July 28th.
Gaga and Marc Quinn muse Zombie Boy diesRick Genest, a Canadian fashion model, artist and actor famed for his heavily-tattooed body, has died, six days before his 33rd birthday.
Unique Cyprus drama festival takes audience back to ancient Greece
Documentary on Ed Sheeran highlights his creativity
Cher has redefined herself a dozen times, but always remained a true diva | ViewShe is an entertainer so durable and consistently excellent that we joke she'll outlast human civilization
Mass airport brawl between rap stars closes airport terminal in ParisMass airport brawl between rap stars Booba and Kaaris forces Paris terminal to close
Croatia bids emotional farewell to beloved singer DragojevicThousands of people who had farewell to the deceased Croatian musician Oliver Dragojević came to the Split waterfront. On his set stage, he sang and played several of his legendary songs.
Zimbabwe's ruling party announced as election winner; opposition disagreesThe possibility of confrontation is an unnerving reminder of the tensions that pervade an African nation debilitated by Robert Mugabe's long rule.
The self-propelled wooden models that are delighting the worldWelcome to UGEARS’ workshop, where horses, trains and instruments powered by gears, cranks and rubber bands are crafted.
Police warn people against Kiki challenge after injuries reported
Pub tycoon pushes Brexit alongside pints in the U.K.Tim Martin believes his customers will see benefits from the U.K.'s looming divorce from the European Union. But some drinkers just want a quiet pint.
Wagner's mystical Parsifal mesmerises MunichThe composer's intense, complex masterpiece opened the Munich Opera Festival at the Bavarian State Opera with a stellar cast
Wagner: a life changing experience
75th Venice Film Festival announces line-up
Summer festivals 2018Three European festivals to visit this year are the Globaltica World Cultures Festival in Poland, the Salzburg Festival in Austria and the Boom festival in Portugal highlighting diverse music and drama from around the world
New album from Queen of Fado Amália Rodrigues
Astronaut jams live from space with Kraftwerk
World's biggest alpine horn festival delights Swiss folklore fansThe soft, melancholic notes of hundreds of traditional wooden Swiss alpine horns filled the valley below Mount Tracouet in Switzerland on Sunday (July 22) during the end of world's largest festival of its kind.
Education program for inmates in South Africa honors Mandela's legacySouth Africa's new Prison to College Pipeline program seeks to address recidivism by providing prisoners with access to public university-level education.
Backstage at one of the world’s largest indoor theme parks
Full transcript: Russian duo prank call EU leadersThe full transcripts of two prank calls carried out by Russian pranksters on EU leaders Juncker and Mogherini.
Tunisian protest singer on world tourTunisian protest singer on world tour
Security concerns after Juncker, Mogherini duped in Russian prank call
Rock icon Kurt Cobain remembered at new exhibition in IrelandThe small museum in County Kildare is putting on the exhibition in part because its owner knows Cobain's family.
Cliff Richard wins court case against BBCBritish pop singer Sir Cliff Richard has won a privacy case against the BBC. He has been awarded the equivalent of €220,000 euros in damages ( $260,000 US dollars).
Mamma Mia: Here We Go AgainIt's taken years to produce a sequel to the smash hit musical Mamma Mia
Watch: bus left hanging over Madrid bridge after accidentNo one was hurt in the incident.
How the French community in the UAE gets ready for the World Cup finalHow the French community in the UAE is getting ready for the World Cup final.
Bryn Terfel stars as Falstaff at the Royal Opera House in London"Falstaff" is a Verdi for opera buffs providing a visionary look into the next century. On the stage of the Royal Opera House in London, bass-baritone Bryn Terfel stars as the tragicomical hedonist - in a production by the Canadian Robert Carsen.
Bulgaria, an emerging tourist destination
Ethiopia and Eritrea end two decades of frozen conflict
Mittelfest 2018 dedicated to young artists and European valuesMittelfest is all about Central Europe and the Balkans and this year it's hosted by the town of Cividale in the extreme north east of Italy.
This is the only district in Europe where Roma are the majority
The EU’s ‘anti-meme’ law explained as MEPs reject itEU lawmakers have rejected the fast-tracking of a piece of legislation that critics say would significantly damage internet freedom.
Beijing is their campus: Inside the Chinese capital’s life-changing study tours
Croatian summer: your to do listA handy round up of new things to do, taste, see and experience this summer in Croatia.
Europe’s six most-audacious prison breaksA look at some of the most daring, dangerous and outrageous attempts to escape prison in Europe.
Sitting down with the world's best French contemporary artistRichard Orlinski talked to Living it about humanity, contemporary art and  Lewis Hamilton.
Mexico World Cup parade cancelled for fear of dancing on Lenin's grave
Football, music and gaming: meet the Middle East's upcoming talentCompetitors come in many forms, some are teams going toe-to-toe on a playing field whilst others pit their skills in digital arenas. Then there are those with no opponents, challenging themselves, and the status quo, in musical concert halls.
Summer movies to watchFind out about four films this summer
Ed Sheeran faces $100 million suit for allegedly copying Marvin Gaye hit
Global music blends in at Morocco's Gnaoua World Music Festivalxxx
Breaking musical boundaries: Martin Fröst's daring journey
Inside the clarinet virtuoso's creative mind
Michael Jackson art exhibition to thrill fansNew London art exhibition explores Michael Jackson as artists' inspiration.
Joe Jackson, head of musical family dynasty, dies at 89Michael Jackson and other siblings alleged physical abuse at the hands of their fearsome father. "If you messed up, you got hit," Michael wrote in his 1985 autobiography.
This Japanese space probe just arrived at an asteroidA Japanese spacecraft has just arrived at an asteroid and is preparing to collect a sample of its rocky interior.
World Cup: Brazil tops group after defeating Serbia 2-0
Russian pop star close to Trump enacts 'pee tape' in latest videoRussian pop star Emin Agalarov, known for arranging a meeting between Donald Trump and a Russian lawyer claiming to have damaging information on Hillary Clinton, releases a music video with Trump and Kim Jong Un lookalikes.
Getting a fair slice of EU copyright cakeAs the EU celebrates bloc's cultural heritage, a fierce political debate rages over tougher copyright plans
Serena Williams on having 2nd child: 'If I weren't working, I'd already be pregnant'
Russians make giant Messi cake to mark star`'s 31st birthday.
Morocco's Gnaoua World Music Festival celebrates its African rootsIts songs and rhythms, are a mixture of Islamic Sufist and pre-Islamic African music and are intended to send its listeners into a trance.
The end of memes? Campaigners dismayed at European internet ruling
Star of Asia international music festival wows audiences in KazakhstanRegional music takes centre stage at Star of Asia festival in Kazakhstan, featuring folk metal music and other music fusion, including local boy band Mad Men
Lyon Festival of Music underway
Morocco's hypnotic Gnaoua Music FestivalMorocco's hypnotic Gnaoua Music Festival
There's more to Hong Kong than meets the eyeIn one of the cities with the highest population density in the world, how does Hong Kong chill out? Come with us and tour the city’s greenbelts, go sailing, play culture vulture. And see why expats make it their home.
Is halotherapy worth its salt? We tried it.Is halotherapy an original new spa offer, an alternative treatment or a placebo? We tried it to find out.
Beyoncé's powerful new music video eloquently subverts white spaces | View
What is the summer solstice?It's the longest day of the year in the northern hemisphere.
An oasis in MarrakeshMajestic horses and turquoise water - spending 3 days in the family-owned Selman Marrakech.
Colombian fans bring salsa spirit to SaranskWith their yellow shirts and appetite for a fiesta, Colombian soccer supporters brought a wave of tropical exuberance to the stolid citizens of Saransk ahead of their teams' World Cup opener against Japan on Tuesday.
US rapper XXXTentacion shot deadThe controversial rapper was shot dead in Florida in what police say could be a robbery.
US rapper shot dead in FloridaThe 20-year-old, who has released two hit albums, was killed by a gunman as he was leaving a motorcycle dealership.
Rapper XXXTentacion is killed in FloridaXXXTentacion's quick rise to fame was coupled with allegations of brutal domestic abuse.
Russians throw 'Venetian Carnival' in floods to woo roadwork fixturesLocals decided to shed light on their town's problem in a humorous way.
Van kills one in hit-and-run outside Dutch concertPolice arrest driver of delivery vehicle.
The Romanian village without thievesResidents of this town can leave their money in bags in the street.
May backs 'upskirting' law after lone MP blocks bill
Stephen Hawking's voice will be broadcast into spaceThe voice of world-renowned physicist Stephen Hawking will be broadcast into space after his memorial service takes place later today.
Verdi's "La Forza del Destino" casts its spell on ZurichAndreas Homoki's production of La Forza del Destino, The Force of Destiny, runs at the Zurich Opera House until the end of June
The music born in the streetsOnce living in the streets, Portuguese singer Susana Silva was saved by music.
World Cup 2018 set to begin in RussiaFans of the beautiful game don't have to wait much longer as football's showpiece gets underway today
Busker kicks-off European tour and hosts gigs from her converted vanPortuguese singer-songwriter Susanna Silva used to sleep on the streets of London. Now, she is On The Road across Europe, performing concerts on the street and inside her mobile home.
Georgia's PM Giorgi Kvirikashvili resignsPrime Minister Kvirikashvili resigns over "different points of view" with ruling party and amidst a month of anti-government protests.
Joanna Stingray: The California girl that shot to fame in the USSRThis is a story about Joanna Stingray. A girl from California who found herself in 1980s Russia on the radar of the KGB and FBI for smuggling out underground Soviet music that Americans were never supposed to hear.
Spoons are the official instrument for the 2018 FIFA World CupSpoons have been used in Russian folk music for hundreds of years.
Half a day on Praslin, SeychellesOne of the the Seychelles largest and most accessible islands has managed to keep its paradise status.
Restaurants honor Anthony Bourdain's memory by trying to help othersThe celebrated chef and TV host made an impact on legions of fans throughout his career.
Legendary Egyptian singer returns to the stage - as a puppetA group of puppeteers has brought Egypt's legendary singer Om Kalthoum and her orchestra back to life.
Robert De Niro drops the F-bomb on Trump at Tonys"Harry Potter" and a revival of "Angels in America" win big at a politically charged ceremony featuring students from Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School.
Dolly Parton's Netflix series is an overdue acknowledgement of the legend's impactParton was inducted into the Country Music Hall of Fame in 1999, before some of her youngest fans were born.
Music to the ears of buskers everywhereA new payment system is up and running in London for street musicians and artists who have seen takings plummet, as more and more people go out without cash.
Tel Aviv celebrates 20th Gay PrideMore than 250,000 revellers flocked to Tel Aviv, Israel, to celebrate the 20th annual Gay Pride.
World Cup 2018: how to follow England
Devon village claims title for World's Smallest NightclubDon't get hung up, but there's only room for one at a time on the dancefloor of this converted phone box.
Cuban singer releases album at 87 years oldKnown as 'The Diva', Omara Portuondo shot to international fame through Wim Wenders documentary film about the Buena Vista Social Club in 1999.
Sao Paulo on paradeBrazil puts on a spectacular Gay Pride Parade in a show of unity for LGBT rights
Another success for Cecilia Bartoli at the Whitsun Festival
Greek National Opera presents 'Nabucco'One of Verdi's most popular operas will open on Friday at the Odeon of Herodes Atticus as part of the Athens Epidaurus Festival.
MAXXI Bulgari Art prize exhibition opensThe work of the three finalists in the MAXXI Bulgari Art prize will go on display in Rome on Friday.
Pulitzer prize for US rapper LamarThe album, launched last year, has been a huge critical and commercial success and has received many international awards including a Grammy for Best Rap album
Reggae star Ziggy Marley releases new solo album
Half a day in Seminyak, BaliNatalie Lefevre presents the lowdown on one of Bali's most popular destinations.
K-pop group BTS top US album chartsBTS go where no Korean pop outifit has gone before just days after Billboard music awards triumph.
London buskers to accept contactless card paymentsLondon is set to introduce contactless card payments for street performers in what organisers are calling a world first
French band performs on slacklines 1,400m in the airFrench band Houle Douce amazed Chinese spectators with a thrilling concert on slacklines suspended 1,400-meters-high in China's Zhangjiajie National Forest Park.
Two dead after falling ill at UK's Mutiny FestivalAn 18-year-old woman and a 20-year-old man have died after becoming unwell at Mutiny Festival in Hampshire, UK
Watch: NYC bike crew gains Instagram fame with crazy street tricks
Spanish rapper on the run to avoid prison sentence for lyrics 'glorify
Cornish group wins 'Eurovision for regional languages'The Rowan Tree, a folk music group from Cornwall, has won Liet International XXL — a singing competition solely for regional and minority languages
Scorpions back for 'once in a lifetime' eventAlmost 20 years after their historic appearance with the Berlin Philharmonic, the Scorpions are reprising the event with the Athens state orchestra.
Sony buys EMI to become the world's biggest music publisherSony is splashing out €2bn to buy a controlling stake in the music publisher EMI.
The deal will take advantage of the rapid growth in streaming services, which have driven a recovery in the music industry.
Tbilisi's first ever international art exhibition
A weekend in DubaiDubai is a global city that knows how to entertain.
Venezuela's Maduro favored to win second term amid severe crisisThe presidential election comes during a deepening crisis that's made food scarce and inflation soar as oil production in the once wealthy nation plummets.
Saudi Arabian women's driving activists arrested just weeks before ban is lifted
Everything you need to know about the royal wedding
Rolando Villazón's 'Die Fledermaus' travels in time
Four-fingered self-taught pianist plays Carnegie HallDarrius Simmons also uses prosthetics to reach the piano pedals
What makes a popular song successful?An upbeat, “party-like” anthem is more likely to gain traction in the charts than depressing ballad, yet sad songs are becoming more common, according to a study released on Wednesday.
"Bohemian Rhapsody" trailer rocks Queen fansThe movie about the life & times of Queen and Freddie Mercury doesn't come out until the autumn, but the fans are being worked into a fever pitch with this teaser.
Royal wedding merchandise you never imagined you neededWant to show your royalist credentials? Here are a couple of suggestions.
Auction of Prince memorabilia delights fans"It would be amazing to have a piece of him," says one fan.
Princely items go on sale in New YorkMemorabilia from the estate of the late star, Prince, go on auction this weekend and are on display until Friday at the Hard Rock cafe in Times Square.
Eurovision winner Netta Barzilai lands in IsraelIsrael's winner in the Eurovision song contest, Netta Barzilai, landed in Tel Aviv early on Monday (May 14), where she danced to a crowd of applauding fans and journalists, still on the runway.
Eurovision Song Contest winner, Netta, performs 'Toy' during grand finalNetta Barzilai is sassy, she's fun and she can sing — and now the Israeli has won the Eurovision Song Contest with a catchy techno dance tune about women's empowerment.
Lisbon prepares for the final of Eurovision 2018
'Nuits Sonores' 2018: 'Nights of Sound' in Lyon!They are dancing until dawn at the annual electronic music festival in the French city of Lyon
Interview with Ellen Von Unwerth at the Opera GalleryClaudia Schiffer, Naomi Campbell, Kate Moss, Rhianna, Lady Gaga. “I shot them all”.
Frightened Rabbit singer found deadThe missing musician had tweeted: "Be so good to everyone you love. It's not a given ... I'm away now. Thanks."
Half a day in Los AngelesNatalie Lefevre describes how she makes the most of LA
Eurovision: more than words?It's kitsch, but the Eurovision song contest — culminating in Lisbon this weekend — also confronts Brussels politics.
Chinese channel banned from Eurovision
'Women support women!'  Eurovision presenter Catarina Furtado on her teamPortuguese television star Catarina Furtado, 45, is one of four women that will present this year’s Eurovision. She has been speaking to Euronews about what the song contest means to her and how it links in with her charity work to improve women’s rights.
Women at Hard Rock Cafe told to ‘wear skirts, not trousers’Female employees at a music-themed restaurant in Iceland have been told to wear skirts to work, it has been claimed.
New batch of Russian Facebook ads released. Here's who was targeted.The ads highlight how Russia's efforts focused on divisive cultural issues
Flamenco as therapy
Who are the world's oldest leaders?After the election victory of Malaysia's Mahathir Mohamad, aged 92, Euronews profiles some pensioners past and present who have occupied the world stage.
David Goodall, 104, ends his life in Switzerland
Childish Gambino's 'This is America' video is contemporary Shakespeare | ViewA key aspect of Shakespeare's works are their lack of easy answers. Likewise, Childish Gambino's latest music video refuses to provide cheap moralism.
English song dominance on the decline at Eurovision 2018Eurovision likes to trumpet its diversity but the truth is songs have become almost monolingual. But is there fresh hope for those who want a bit more linguistic variety at the annual song contest?
Lyon's Nuits Sonores electro music festival
ICYMI: Who stole the show at the Eurovision Song Contest first semi final?
Stars put on 'heavenly' show for Met GalaFrom saints to sinners, guests took to heart the 2018 theme of "Heavenly Bodies: Fashion and the Catholic Imagination" at the Metropolitan Museum of Art's Costume Institute ball.
The winning formula: What does it take to bag Eurovision victory?What do you need to take home the prize from the battlefield that is the Eurovision Song Contest? Euronews investigates.
Classical magic in Malta!The sixth Malta International Music Festival has brought together world-class artists for moments of unforgettable magic in Valetta, the 2018 European capital of culture.
The sky's the limit in Batumi
Klimt paintings go digital in new Paris expo
Dublin's best spots to visit during a business tripA Living it guide to mixing the best of business and pleasure in Dublin, Ireland.
Stormy Daniels calls for Trump's resignation in 'SNL' skit
Geneva: the summer 2018 mini guideTen cool places where to stay, eat, shop and relax during contemporary art biennale artgeneve/sculptures happening this summer
How will hyperspeed and AI tech shake up the Middle East?This week’s Inspire Middle East goes high-tech as we focus on the big and small innovations that will be impacting tomorrow’s world.
Editors: 'Violence' on stage
Yuja Wang on Rachmaninov: "Every time I play his music it's... a gift!"The brilliant Chinese pianist has delighted audiences by performing Rachmaninov's 4th piano concerto with the Rotterdam Philharmonic Orchestra, conducted by Yannick Nézet-Séguin
"Brexit was a very dark day," say indie rock band Editors
The Royal Wedding: everything you need to know
Watch: Clarinet concert closes Malta International Music FestivalAustrian solo clarinettist Andreas Ottensamer and the Armenian State Symphony Orchestra play live from the closing concert at the Malta International Music Festival.
Chinese Wa people celebrate their annual "Monihei" CarnivalChinese people of Wa ethnic group reveled in their annual "Monihei" Carnival on Monday in the southwest province of Yunnan.
Gibson goes looking for the lost chord as the company files for bankruptcyDeclining guitar sales and a flawed diversification four years ago have dragged the legendary guitar-maker into crisis.
Anti-migrant mayor's message to Trump: Border barrier 'saved my town'The modern-day iron curtain stretches for 100 miles and is patrolled by soldiers, dogs, and 3,000 border police.
'We're in the Money': Sainsbury's CEO sings his way into an apology after hot-mic moment
Abba return to the recording studioThe Swedish pop group Abba have returned to the recording studio for the first time since the 1980s. The quartet revealed the news on Instagram on Friday.
Abba are back in the studioAbba are back in the studio
Your views: What Swedish DJ Avicii meant to fans from around the world
Sustainability and hyperspeed: the future of tourism showcased at ATMThis week, Inspire Middle East tours the Arabian Travel Market, a leading event for the tourism industry looking at the future of travel in the region. We also report on the real-estate event Cityscape Abu Dhabi to discover how much affordable housing really costs in today’s money.
Eurovision 2018: First-time host Portugal keeps it simpleOrganisers in Lisbon won't be putting on light-shows or videowalls for acts taking part in the annual songfest on May 12. Performers can, however, provide their own effects
International collaborations shine at 2018 Latin Billboard AwardsLatin music celebrates its dominance of the world stage.
Avicii's family say he "could not go on any longer"
Children's pop choir goes viral on YouTube
He 'felt the Bern.' Now he's shaking up Russian politics.Vitali Shkliarov runs what he calls a "political incubator" that helps novice candidates run on independent tickets in local races.
New smart wall lets you control your home with swipes, tapsSpecial paint offers a low-cost way to make intelligent surfaces.
Swedish choir sings 'Wake Me Up!' at Avicii hometown tribute
Germany scraps major music awards over anti-Semitism outcryEcho awarded German rappers Kollegah and Farid Bang the hip-hop/urban prize earlier this month for an album featuring lyrics in which they say their bodies are “more defined than Auschwitz prisoners.”
Syrian musicians transforming trauma into art'Syrians Got Talent' musicians perform in Brussels to spread message of resilience and solidarity
Portugal's Carnation Revolution through the eyes of a coup leaderIt was one of the most important days in Portugal's recent history, when four decades of authoritarian rule would abruptly end.
Balkan Trafik: building bridges through music
Half a day in BrooklynExplore the passion for being unique in Brooklyn and its neighbour Williamsburg.
Prince heirs sue over "preventable" deathRelatives claim hospital and pharmacy gave wrong diagnosis.
'I have my life back': Avril Lavigne makes 1st red carpet appearance in 2 yearsThe notoriously private singer, who revealed she was battling Lyme disease in 2014, looked radiant at a recent charity event.
South Korea turns off propaganda speakers on North Korean border
'No criminal suspicion' surrounding Avicii death'No criminal suspicion' surrounding Avicii death according to police sources.
German town holds festival for peace in protest at neo-Nazi event
Swedish DJ Avicii, 28, found dead in Oman: publicist
Centre Stage: Music in the Middle East, Past & PresentThis week we tread the boards at Dubai Opera and go behind the scenes with the European Union Youth Orchestra as they tune-up for their debut performance in the emirate. We also visit a refugee camp in Jordan where traditional music is helping Syrians reconnect with their heritage.
Plácido Domingo and Sonya Yoncheva illuminate the Met in Verdi gem
Plácido Domingo's special bond with Verdi and Sonya Yoncheva
UK urges Commonwealth to tackle marine pollution
Charges in Prince's death could be announced ThursdayA Minnesota prosecutor will announce the results of a two-year investigation.
Hugo Pratt exhibition opens in LyonThe creator of Corto Maltese has his work honored
Facebook to roll out Europe's stringent privacy rules worldwide
What is ISIS? Key facts about the Islamic State
Lamar becomes first rapper to win Pulitzer
Trump has no idea what trade wars actually look like. It's not pretty | View
Hungary: Tens of thousands in anti-Orban protest
The Culture Summit: Art as an agent of social changeAward-winning British photojournalist Jimmy Nelson takes us on a journey to the hidden corners of the world, putting indigenous communities into perspective through his camera lens at the Culture Summit Abu Dhabi. We also master martial arts with a real-life Power Ranger at Middle East Comic Con.
Joyous music written in Nazi concentration camps is brought to life"Life did not end with the murder of these musicians. Life remains with the music they have written."
Eurovision act to sing in 34 languages
Spanish rappers 'defend freedom of expression' with new music video
Dutch residents rage at singing road in their villageA musical stretch of road is disturbing residents’ sleep in the Dutch village of Jelsum, Leeuwarden, and locals have had enough.
Tallinn Music Week celebrates its 10th anniversaryEast meets West, Pop meets Punk, Jazz meets Folk.
Most-watched YouTube video Despacito defaced in apparent 'hack'YouTube and video-hosting service Vevo appear to have fallen victim to a hack that saw numerous high-profile music videos defaced.
Liza Minnelli's iconic items on displayThe family photos, the ruby slippers and the Oscar-award nomination of the actress are part of the exhibition.
Senegal's fishermen say European overfishing is crippling them
Watch: Denmark silo demolition goes badly wrong crushing nearby building
24 hours in KaunasHistory, architecture and gastro-food: discovering the best of Kaunas, Lithuania
Belarus: stifled freedoms and glimmers of hope
Me and Mario: robots that care
Terry Gilliam weaves his magic at the Opera Bastille
YouTube suspect was vegan who had complained about 'suppression'
YouTube HQ shooting: What we know
Start-up success in PolandStart-ups in Poland are riding the country's continuous economic growth. A survey by Startup Poland says that some of the main sectors include big data, IoT and biotech.
Spotify to make its New York Stock Exchange debut
Cults are terrifying. But they're even worse for women | View
Haitian voodoo followers sacrifice animals at Easter ceremonyHaitian voodoo followers marked one of the holiest days of their religious calendar with a traditional ceremony on Easter Sunday in Port-au-Prince.
Steven Bochco dies; co-creator of 'NYPD Blue' and 'Hill Street Blues'Bochco was responsible for shows with large ensemble casts, serialized storylines and edgy content.
South Korea sends cultural exports north to charm kim Jong UnKim first N. Korean leader to attend a South Korean cultural event of any kind as relations between the pair continue to show signs of improvement.
EU makes borderless streaming of TV, movies a realityPay-to-view subscribers will now be able to follow their shows when abroad, but Hollywood may need some persuading the new EU law is good for business.
Jesus Christ Superstar coming to TVThe smash hit musical Jesus Christ Superstar is getting a makeover for the Easter weekend with John Legend taking the lead role
Why Mary Poppins is banned in Germany on Good Friday
In Ukraine's war even the dead cannot rest in peaceIn Hranitne, a village at the heart of the war zone in eastern Ukraine, even the cemetery was not a place of peace.
Brits won't be able to access UK Netflix in EU after BrexitAs of the withdrawal date, UK citizens won't be able to benefit from their digital subscriptions, like BBC iPlayer and their UK Netflix catalogue, when travelling in the EU.
Pergolesi's Mass in D Major is performed for first time in nearly 300After performing it conductor says it shows a new and more joyful side to the 18th century composer.
Estonia celebrates 100 years with major art exhibitionEstonia celebrates 100 years with a major art exhibition in Tallinn  exploring its national identity
France to make school compulsory from the age of three
Tiny London football club battles New York real estate developerFounded in 1893, the club gained a hipster cult following partly because of its staunch commitment to social justice off the field.
José Abreu, the father of El Sistema, dies aged 78José Abreu, the award-winning founder of a program that pulled thousands of Venezuelan children from crime and poverty through music, died
Uniting cultures: Gustavo Dudamel's Americas tour with the Vienna Phil
Dudamel inspires young musicians with passionate workshop
Turkey's garbage men make music from trashPlaying rubbish containers with brooms, bin men in the Turkish capital Ankara have formed a music group called 'Tin Band'.
Ex-Beatle Ringo Starr knighted by Prince William in London ceremonyStarr said the honor "means a lot".
Arise Sir Richard StarkeyBeatles drummer Ringo Starr is knighted more than two decades after Paul McCartney.
Voter turnout key for Kremlin as Russia heads to polls
Group of rural voters bring music to the village polling stationSome residents of Rediko, a village in the Nizhnegorod region of Russia, sang national songs as they walked to the polling station to cast their vote in Russia's presidential election.
Listen: Former DJ releases album to help drive people to sleepThe 19-track music collection has a total run time of over five hours for the more stubborn sleepers.
From the front line: rebuilding shattered lives in eastern Ukraine
Prince Albert of Monaco celebrates 60th birthday
See them before they vanish: Europe's most under-threat heritage sitesA communist monument in mountainous Bulgaria, an ice factory in England and an art nouveau casino in Romania are among Europe’s most endangered heritage sites, say campaigners.
Java Jazz Festival delightsThe three day event attracted some of the world's best known jazz legends from the 70s and 80s.
Live performance: The Gift takes the stage at EuronewsThe Portuguese alternative-pop quartet pop into Euronews' 'Green cube' HQ in Lyon.
Stephen Hawking: From black hole theories to American sitcoms, Hawking
Fierce fashion and 'glamazones' stride Moscow Fashion Week day 2A sense of self-confidence emerges from the looks walking today on the runway.
Ethiopia holds circus to promote performance arts and African cultureEthiopia recently held the second edition of the African Circus Arts Festival, which saw 11 circus troupe artists from six African countries perform at the event.
VR, cinema and jazz: discovering creative industries at the Abu Dhabi
Violin virtuoso Kyung Wha Chung debuts with Sir Antonio PappanoThe 'unstoppable maestro' Sir Antonio Pappano conducts Brahms' challenging and emotional violin concerto in Rome, featuring the legendary South Korean violinist Kyung Wha Chung.
24 hours in MiamiThe city on the sea that delivers what you expect and more.
Fashion meets art at Christie’sBritish Fashion Council's annual Fashion Arts Commission initiative, honoured five of the most talented graduates from the Royal Academy Schools.
“The world’s first digital circular fashion platform”Discover the app offering fashion giveaways from high-profile style setters
Saudi women take the wheel
Crocodile fed tasty treats as part of religious festival in PakistanA crocodile is taking centre stage at a festival in Karachi celebrating the patron saint of Pakistan's Sheedi community
Touring Oslo's Creative Scene
24 hours in TulumA paradise that has been appreciated for centuries.
How migration influences voters in Italy's general electionHow important is the issue of migration to voters in Italy? Is the 'alarmist' way the issue is being reported in some sections of the media likely to influence the vote?
#March4Women: Choir to sing 'You Don't Own Me' in LondonLast rehearsals are underway ahead of a performance which will close the annual event dedicated to promoting gender equality
Visit by King Felipe to Barcelona sparks riot
In pictures: Winter Olympics closing ceremony in Pyeongchang
2018 Winter Olympics: What to expect
Winter International Arts Festival in Sochi 2018The 11th Winter International Arts Festival in Sochi offers a sophisticated selection.
Ed Sheeran documentary opens at the Berlin Film Festival
Iceland's recipe for gender parity
Hanna Björg Vilhjálmsdóttir: "the school system must be part of the solution to gender discrimination"
Gounod's 'Roméo et Juliette' mesmerizes BarcelonaIt is the most famous love story of all time: Romeo and Juliet. Now Charles Gounod's operatic adaptation of the Shakespearean tragedy returns to the Gran Teatre del Liceu in Barcelona.
Dua Lipa and Stormzy scoop top gongs at Brit AwardsDua Lipa and Stormzy, two of Britain’s most exciting breakthrough pop acts, have beaten much more experienced competitors to take the top prizes at the Brit awards ceremony at London’s O2 Arena.
A one way ticket to violence: my life as a Polish skinheadTwo decades ago fascist groups had the same ideology in Poland as today, but their position in society was very different.
Trump pushes for gun 'bump stocks' ban
The fight of the 'fleurs'The annual flower carnival at Villefranche-sur-Mer in France involves a naval battle like no other!
The Basel carnival and the traditional Morgenstraich
Sochi surprises at the Winter International Arts FestivalClassical music and a whole lot more is on offer at the annual event in the Russian city
The 17 victims of the Florida school shooting
Trailblazing tech
Silk stockings are backA small French factory decided to revive the desire for the luxury of silk stockings.
Pussy Riot members say Swedish exile is price of opposing Putin
Witness the Sharjah Light FestivalTwenty-four international light artists display breath-taking installations for 11 days in Sharjah UAE.
Eurovision goes underground in Romania
Johann Johannsson found deadThe Icelandic composer was discovered at his Berlin apartment.
Horns and sheepskin: Hungary marks end of winter with Busós festivalThe Busós are frightening, devil-like creatures who wear horned wooden masks and big sheepskin costumes as they attempt to scare away winter and welcome spring.
Carnival spirit: revellers dance their way through Rio's streetsThe Carmelitas bloco is one of the most traditional carnival street parties in Rio de Janeiro, taking its name from the legend of a cloistered catholic nun that escaped the convent to join a carnival street party.
Brexit deal in doubt over UK demands
EU tackles Geo-blocking with half-measures: ViewThe EU's new law banning geo-blocking for e-commerce is perhaps one of the most important steps towards a true single market for consumers, writes the European Consumer Organisation's Agustín Reyna.
Donizetti's 'Elisir d'Amore' wows Vienna
Backstage with Benjamin Bernheim
World’s first dance club in zero gravity takes offClubbers from across the globe beat over 30,000 applicants to secure their spot on a 'weightless' flight over the Mediterranean.
Bosnia renews efforts to find lyrics for its national anthemThe Balkan nation is one of three countries in the world that do not have lyrics for its national anthem, because its politicians have failed to agree any  for 19 years.
The place that inspired Walt Disney celebrates its 175th anniversary
Why did US stocks plunge and how does it affect Europe in 2018?
Online shopping to get a whole lot easier across the EU
Porsche celebrates brand’s design for 70th anniversary with new LA exh'The Porsche Effect' at LA's Petersen Automotive Museum highlights the history and significance of the Porsche car company - from design, to engineering, to racing.
Paris attack suspect to face trial in Brussels today
Lana Del Rey kidnapping foiledPolice in the USA have arrested a man who reportedly threatened to kidnap the singer Lana Del Rey
Spice Girls to reunite?
Lady Gaga cancels European tour dates due to 'severe pain'The pop star, who is known to suffer from fibromyalgia, said she was "devastated" to disappoint her fans. "I love you, but this is beyond my control," she said on Twitter.
Watch live: The Legendary Tigerman performs at EuronewsThe Portuguese musician performs live at Euronews' headquarters in Lyon.
How to stay inspired and motivated at workProfessional motivators share seven strategies to help you get your head back in the game this week.
Malta's baroque music festival
Sausage roll giant Greggs offers customers candle-lit Valentine's Day
11 things you need to know about the 2018 Grammy Awards
Full list of Grammy Award winnersMusic's MVPs gathered at Madison Square Garden Sunday night for the 60th Grammy Awards. These are the winners.
'Maze Runner: The Death Cure' sprints past 'Jumanji'The third part of the dystopian trilogy "Maze Runner" trilogy was delayed for a year after star Dylan O'Brien was injured on the set.
40 years of Joy DivisionIt's 40 years since Joy Division made their live debut at Pips Disco in Manchester. Out of the industrial gloom of Northern England came one of Britain's most influential bands
What Cardi B's Grammy debut means for Latinas in New YorkDominican-Trinidadian rapper Cardi B is debuting at this year's Grammy Awards with two nominations, but her journey to stardom reflects the life stories of Latinas growing up in The Bronx.
Grammys will address #MeToo with a white rose
Maverick, magician, misanthrope: death claims The Fall's Mark E. SmithOver 40 years making music with 32 studio albums and as many lives, influencing countless bands and turning over 66 band members in the process, the Mancunian's cultural legacy is immense.
Monte Carlo's take on Offenbach's 'Les Contes d'HoffmannStar tenor Juan Diego Florez takes to the stage as visionary writer ETA Hoffman in Jacques Offenbach's fantastical odyssey at the Salle Garnier in Monte Carlo.
Oscars 2018: The results are in
South African jazz musician and anti-apartheid activist Hugh MasekelaThe man known as the “father of South African jazz”, who used his music to oppose racial segregation, has died aged 78.
Neil Diamond retires from touring, citing Parkinson'sDiamond, who is to receive a lifetime achievement Grammy, said he would continue writing and composing.
For the first time... Indigenous ballet
Women's March 2018: 11 of the best signs, chosen by Euronews
Malta gets its mojo as Valetta becomes European Capital of CultureFor 2018 Valletta shares the honour with Leeuwarden in The Netherlands.
Tom Petty died from 'accidental overdose'Rocker Tom Petty died in October due to "multisystem organ failure".
Rock legend Tom Petty died of an accidental drug overdoseTom Petty's family shared their thoughts on Facebook as the Los Angeles County coroner confirmed the cause of his death.
Youth sports venture wins LeBron's backingThe NBA star and others have invested in a social media-based sports streaming venture run by 26-year-old twins who dropped out of college.
Despite U.S.-Cuba tensions, more Americans attend Havana's famed jazz festival
Just say 'om:' Mindfulness techniques that can save you moneyMindfulness and meditation techniques can help you curb overspending.
'Gangster jihadist' rapper who married FBI translator killed in SyrKnown during his German rap career as "Deso Dogg,” Denis Cuspert has died fighting in Syria, according to reports.
"Misfit" is the new album from The Legendary Tigerman, now on tourNew single "Fix of rock 'n' roll" drops ahead of April album release.
Valletta International Baroque Festival enters its sixth yearMaltese capital will also become a European capital of culture as the festival enters its second week.
London paints in light to banish the winter bluesFifty-eight artists display their works for four days around the British capital.
Matera and Plovdiv, 2019 European Capitals of Culture
Refugee orchestra's message of peaceThe musicians in Brazil's Mundana Refugi Orchestra are refugees from ten different nations who come together on stage to deliver a message of peace and hope.
Salvador Sobral vows to return to music after successful heart operatiMusician will be awarded European Border Breakers Award
Widow of Eagles co-founder Frey files suit against hospitalThe widow of Glenn Frey, the Eagles guitarist and co-founder who died at 67, filed a wrongful death lawsuit against the Manhattan hospital where the music legend was treated.
Run like hell...Pink Floyd exhibition opens in Rome
Cranberries singer Dolores O'Riordan's death is not suspiciousThe 45 year old Irish musician was found dead at the Hilton hotel in London on Monday.
Milan Fashion Week continues
Tributes are paid to lead Cranberries singer Dolores O'RiordanMusic world is shocked by Irish musician's sudden death
Dolores O'Riordan, lead singer of The Cranberries dies at age 46Dolors O'Riordan, who led The Cranberries to international fame, died at age 46 while in London for a recording session.
The ​Cranberries singer, ​Dolores O'Riordan, dies aged 46Dolores O’Riordan, leader singer with the rock group The Cranberries, has died suddenly at the age of 46, reports Reuters, quoting Irish broadcaster
Take a look at the latest trends at the Milan Fashion Week
Half a day in Cyprus
MLK Day: Ways to celebrate and honor the civil rights iconAs thousands of events take place to honor Dr. Martin Luther King Jr., here is our guide of celebrations for this year's MLK Day.
What I learned after giving my four teens almost total control over their livesIt's appropriate to nurture and protect teens from physical and psychological harm, but it's not helpful to decide for them the course of their future.
Raw water is the dangerously stupid 'natural food' fad nobody asked forA new movement is embracing something that could very well cause you dysentery.
Jiri Drahos: The dark horse in Czech presidential elections
Mary J. Blige gets star on Hollywood Walk of Fame on birthday"On this day, my birthday, God put my name on a star," Mary J. Blige said.
Pragmatism pays as Yoncheva excels in Tosca at the New York Met
Obama gives dancing tips to Letterman on new showIn a teaser clip released by Netflix on Twitter, former President Barack Obama talks about dancing and "dad moves" with David Letterman on Letterman's new show.
MP performs anti-Brexit rap in parliament debate
Meghan and Harry's royal visit divides 'London's Harlem'Prince Harry and his American wife-to-be Meghan Markle visited a youth-led radio station in the Brixton area of London.
Justin Timberlake is back with his robotic new single 'Filthy'
2018 Golden Globe Award winners
Helsinki's Winter Secrets
Golden Globes recap: Not too shabby for Europeans
Golden Globes 2018: The full list of winners by category
Broadway legend Ben Vereen accused of sexual harassment"While it was my intention to create an environment that replicated the themes of that musical during the rehearsal process, I have since come to understand that it is my conduct, not my intentions, which are relevant here," Vereen said in a statement.
8 biggest fitness trends to try in 2018
What I saw while held 48 hours in a French migrant detention centreA Chilean man spent 48 hours in a French detention centre. His account gives rare insight into how EU detention centers work—and how Europe is dealing with illegal migration.
Kendrick Lamar to produce 'Black Panther' soundtrack
8 biggest fitness trends to try in 2018New ways to channel your inner athlete — and take your workout routine to the next level.
9 gadgets that make getting healthy easierMinimize the time and effort it takes to clean up your diet and get moving.
Steve Bannon calls Trump Tower Russian meeting 'treasonous' in new bookSteve Bannon, the former White House chief strategist, is calling a meeting of Trump campaign officials with a Russian lawyer in Trump Tower during the presidential campaign as "treasonous" and "unpatriotic" in a new book.
Spotify hit with $1.6 billion copyright lawsuitWixen Music Publishing Inc last week sued music streaming giant Spotify for allegedly using thousands of songs without a license and compensation to the music publisher.
$1.6 billion lawsuit accuses Spotify of short-changing songwritersThe suit lists thousands of songs that Wixen Music Publishing says Spotify is streaming without proper compensation, including hits by the Beach Boys, Tom Petty, and Missy Elliott.
Here are the men accused of sexual misconduct since WeinsteinTavis Smily, Morgan Spurlock, Matt Lauer and Charlie Rose have become the latest public figures to be accused of sexual misconduct.
Best way to resist in 2018? Maybe log off more oftenDefiance can mean resisting psychological colonization, and celebrating imagination, history, art, love and joy.
Best way to resist in 2018? Maybe log off more oftenDefiance can mean resisting psychological colonization, and celebrating imagination, history, art, love and joy.
Millennials don't like Trump. Here's how they say he could win them over.Trump is polling poorly with younger Americans — but so are both parties. We asked what participants of recent NBC News/GenForward surveys hope to see in 2018.
'Star Wars: The Last Jedi' tops $1 billion worldwide"The Last Jedi" is now the eighth highest-grossing domestic movie of all time, only $15 million behind last year's "Rogue One: A Star Wars Story."
For LGBTQ community, 2017 was a mixed bagFrom the legalization of gay marriage in Australia to an attempted rollback of trans rights in the U.S., 2017 produced a series of highs and lows for the community.
New Year's Eve really is the worst holidayDecades of focus on one specific month as our yearly transformation starting point has poisoned the concept.
No power and growing anger at ground zero in Puerto RicoTourism is gone and power and clean water haven't returned to Humacao, where Hurricane Maria first entered, leaving residents desperate and frustrated.
Ringo Starr and Barry Gibb knighted in UK New Year honours list
Veteran white men top list of 2017 music tours
Half a day in Turks & CaicosNear the West Indies, you’ll discover Turks and Caicos Islands. It was my dream to visit this place for years and I finally understood what all the
'Disruptor in chief' Trump leaves U.S. standing aloneDonald Trump's vision for U.S. foreign policy is crystal clear and summed up in two words: "America First."
RIP 2017: The tech graveyard of what we lost this yearCue the sad violin music as we take a look back at some of the technology staples we loved and lost in 2017.
Space and science look ahead 2018
Tea and karaoke become daily obsession for China's baby boomersKaraoke has been an alcohol-fueled nighttime activity for young Chinese. But when the sun comes up, these venues are now seeing a more gray-haired crowd.
Decem-brrr to remember: Cold, Snow, set records across U.S.
Ringing in 2018: New Year's traditions you might not have heard ofiNew Year's traditions are many and varied. Here are 15 unique celebrations, traditions, taboos, and festivals celebrated in Asia and Asian America.
The important life lesson that transformed songwriter Skylar Grey's careerHow the co-writer of "Glorious" and "Love The Way You Lie" finally found success and happiness in life.
Candice Glover opens up about 'American Idol,' Broadway"American Idol" winner Candace Glover talks life after her 2013 win and Broadway debut in "Home For The Holidays."
9 ways Amazon's Alexa can make your life betterThe virtual assistant can order you dinner, call you a cab and much more.
In era of Trump, Kwanzaa is needed affirmationKwanzaa is offering some African-Americans needed affirmation as they reflect on anti-black incidents that occurred this year and look toward 2018 with optimism.
Wonder Woman, Weinstein and Beauty and the Beast: a year in the cinemaOur cinema review of the year kicks off with the passing of Jerry Lewis.
A look back at 2017 in filmWe take a look back at the best moments in cinema in 2017.
Sound of Music actress Heather Menzies-Urich dies aged 68
'Sound of Music' actress Heather Menzies-Urich diesMenzies-Urich, who played Louisa von Trapp in the beloved 1965 film, devoted her recent years to the cancer charity named for her late husband, Robert Urich.
Lorde cancels Israel concert under boycott pressureIsrael's culture minister said Lorde had fallen under the fallen under the influence of "foreign — and ridiculous — political considerations."
The 'Despacito' effect: The year Latino music broke the charts"Despacito" and later "Mi Gente" brought into clear view Latino artists' rising influence in the American and music scene.
Ringo Starr may become a 'Sir'
New year brings uncertainty and fear for some LGBTQ eldersAs many Americans think about what they will receive this Christmas, some LGBTQ seniors are wondering what they may lose in the new year.
Robot DJ receives mixed reviews
Christmas tradition celebrates its 99th year
These nuns 'bring Heaven' to Earth through songThe sisters invite their fans around the world into their world this holiday season through their latest album, "Jesu, Joy of Man's Desiring."
Secularizing Christmas doesn't make it friendlier to non-ChristiansSanta Claus, friendly elves and pagan trees don't make the holiday non-denominational.
Secularizing Christmas doesn't make it friendlier to non-ChristiansSanta Claus, friendly elves and pagan trees don't make the holiday non-denominational.
Undercover in Lisbon’s secret Chinese restaurantsAn adventurous food hunting and atypical dining out experience attracting both the curious and the reckless.
A Holiday music guide with a beatHere are some holiday tunes recommended by us, music experts, and our readers that we will have on repeat this season.
Here are the men accused of sexual misconduct since Weinstein
"Hamilton" transfers from Broadway to London"Hamilton" received a rapturous reception from a star-studded, 1,500-strong audience at the show's official opening night in London on Thursday
Hugh Jackman's P.T. Barnum erases the showman's violent racism"The Greatest Showman" ignores that Barnum's fortune came from by exploiting and abusing African Americans.
2017: a year of farewells and broken records
The year in Latino entertainment: Speaking out, uniting in tragedy and standing up'Coco' got Latino families right, stars like Salma Hayek, John Leguizamo spoke out and stars united for our hurricane and earthquake-stricken families.
Chill out to the cool tunes of Terje IsungsetNorway's foremost ice percussionist and musician makes music with ice instruments, an approach that sees him and singing partner Maria Skranes play dozens of concerts every year.
A sparkling duo: Cecilia Bartoli and Sol Gabetta
Les Arcs: a hotbed of European cinema talent
Here are the men accused of sexual misconduct since WeinsteinTavis Smily, Morgan Spurlock, Matt Lauer and Charlie Rose have become the latest public figures to be accused of sexual misconduct.
Is this baby 24 years old?Emma Gibson was conceived in 1992 but born in 2017, 24 years later. Gibson, born in November, may be the oldest ever frozen embryo to be thawed and born.
Five Quinceañeras shine in new HBO series '15: A Quinceañera Story'The HBO documentary series '15: A QUINCEAÑERA STORY,' is a collection of four short films documenting the planning and celebration of a Hispanic rite of passage, the Quinceañera.
Dustin Hoffman accusers tell their storiesSeveral women accusing Dustin Hoffman of sexual misconduct have spoken out about what they say they endured
4 ways augmented reality will revolutionize your lifeAR is bringing big changes to the way you work, play, drive, and more.
Morocco: Visa For Music showcases Africa and Middle-East artistsThe 2017 Visa For Music (VFM) has taken place in the Moroccan city of Rabat, Morocco.
Young South African ViolinistsA violin club in Masiphumelele Township in South Africa's coastal city, Cape Town aims  to keep youngsters away from trouble in one of the city's most dangerous neighbourhoods.
Maestro Noseda conquers Washington with the EroicaNational Symphonic Orchestra's new musical director gets standing ovation on first night.
France says final farewell to Johnny Hallyday
Your week in 60 secondsHow switched on were you to what was going on in the news this week? Watch our video below to see if you can identify the news story. (We've already given you the country.)
La Scala season opens with rare work that wows the crowd
Rock star Johnny Hallyday leaves his mark on Turkey
Lyon's light festival shows spider invasion and cathedral dismantled
France mourns the death of original rocker Johnny HallydayHe sold 100 million records in a five-decade career, but this French icon, who nearly single-handedly dragged France into the rock and roll era, was almost unknown abroad.
Johnny Hallyday diesInternational French rock star Johnny Hallyday dies at the age of 74

	For the full story, click
French rock star Johnny Hallyday dies aged 74
Great Santa run returns to VegasHordes of runners dressed in Santa costumes filled the streets of Las Vegas on Saturday (Dec. 2) for the 13th annual Great Santa Run.

	The holiday
Your week in 60 seconds
Rolando Villazón and Ildar Abdrazakov: a rare duo
'Funiculì, Funiculà'... Encore!
Visit one of Europe's last cassette factoriesLet us take you on a visit to one of the last audio cassette factories in Europe.
Russia's Polina Bogusevich wins Junior Eurovision Contest
Miss South Africa becomes Miss UniverseThe new Miss Universe is Miss South Africa, Demi-Leigh Nel-Peters,
Spotlight in Rabat on African and Middle Eastern musicThe Moroccan city of Rabat is hosting "Visa For Music"
Celestial controversy as Victoria's Secret Angels walk ShanghaiStars allegedly barred from entering China ahead of catwalk show.
School for refugee minors on Greek island
Half a day in Papagayo, Costa RicaLet’s go fishing or enjoy one of the many tropical beaches of Guanacaste Province in Costa Rica. As the weather gets cold in Europe and most prepare
11 things you didn't know about Charles MansonLittle-known facts about the notorious killer and cult leader who has died aged 83
Bruno Mars dominates the 2017 American Music Awards
As communist relics collapse, the band continues to playMusicans battle to conserve a century of tradition as the world that fostered it disappears around them.
Latin grammy awards get politicalArtists choose to namecheck Puerto Rico and defend "Dreamers" in acceptance speeches.
Medea casts her spell at Wexford
Wexford brings forgotten masterpieces back to life
Pro-EU musician gets funding from department of arch-Brexiter Liam FoxThe composer wants to collaborate with musicians across Europe to fight the idea the UK is retreating to an absurd little enclave.
Gigi’s EyelovemoreThe new luxury footwear label Stuart Weitzman and American top model Gigi Hadid collaboration.
British artist updates Beatles' Sgt Pepper cover featuring 2017's dead celebrities
Shawn Mendes shines at EMA awardsBritish R&B singer Rita Ora hosted the event, but the night belonged to Canadian pop singer Shawn Mendes.
France commemorates the second anniversary of the Paris attacks
Fear, friends and fragments: how one Bataclan survivor is rebuilding his life
Grammy winner Seal pays tribute to Sinatra, Fitzgerald and Cole in new albumBritish artist, Seal, best known for his 1990's soul and R&B hits, pays tribute to jazz and swing legends in his new album, 'Standards'.
Prince Mohammed bin Salman aims to rebrand Saudi Arabia
Iconic rock memorabilia goes under the hammer
Exhibition brings Van Gogh to lifeThere are paintings by Vincent Van Gogh, but this is no ordinary exhibition. Visitors to Van Gogh Alive in Athens are surrounded by a symphony of light, colour and sound.
Disrespecting China’s national anthem can now lead to 3 years in jailPeople are also banned from performing the national anthem in public.
Verdi's rarely staged French version of 'Don Carlos'
Rock and roll legends' relics go on auctionItems once owned by Roll and Roll legends such as Elvis and Jimi Hendrix are going under the hammer this weekend.
Elton John and Ed Sheeran launch charity campaign to share musical memoriesElton John and Ed Sheeran have launched a star-studded charity campaign to share musical memories, and raise funds for orphanage children suffering in silence.
New York legalises dancing after 91-year banHard to believe, but dancing in a bar in NYC might have got you arrested. Until October 31st, when the city scraps a prohibition-era law.
Azerbaijan's fifth carpet symposium opens in Baku
Architects building dreams the Japanese way
"Burning Doors" sees Pussy Riot take tales of terror in Russian prisons to New York
Rock and roll legend Fats Domino dies at 89 - local reports from New OrleansIconic New Orleans singer Fats Domino was one of the world's most influential musicians
Baku Jazz Festival kicks off in AzerbaijanThe Azerbaijani capital hosted its 12th annual Jazz festival with concerts, exhibitions and workshops springing up across the city.
'They didn't shut her up': British fighter plays Ariana Grande in Raqqa
EU Parliament President defends Spanish unityAntonio Tajani had stinging words for Catalan separatists, denouncing those "sowing discord by deliberately ignoring laws"
Rare letter by Titanic victim to his mother, is to be auctioned in the UKA Titanic victim's letter to his mother, written the day before the sinking of the vessel, is expected to sell for thousands at an auction in the UK
Three million people in US carrying loaded handguns each day, study estimatesThey are mainly young men and live in southern states, according to the paper.
Verdi's Masked Ball is a timeless classicA three act tragedy sprinkled with comedy, Verdi’s Un Ballo in Maschera – or masked ball – is one of the Italian composer’s most acclaimed masterpieces.
George Michael felt 'picked on by the gods' after death of mother and partnerPop superstar reveals how he dealt with personal and career setbacks in documentary that turned out to be his last ever project
Ancient amphitheatre found in Jerusalem
Amsterdam Dance Event: the fun must go onNoisiness, rowdiness and logistical difficulties are some problems that typically challenge and restrain a city’s night life. But these things won’t
"Hair" revived in London for show's 50th anniversary1968 musical "Hair" is being revived in London for its 50th anniversary.
Eminem slams Trump in freestyle rap'Any fan of mine who’s a supporter of his, I’m drawing in the sand a line, you’re either for or against,' the rapper said.
Bananarama are backBritish pop group Bananarama are back together after 30 years, to tour US for the first time
Las Vegas 'Red Hat Hero' found via social media
Rapper Nelly released after rape allegationsUS rapper Nelly denies allegations upon release from prison in Washington
NRA urges extra regulations on gun 'bump-stocks' after Las Vegas carnage
Dancing is the best medicineDiscover an NHS-approved meditative dance and movement system aiding mental wellbeing and physical fitness.
Berlin Staatsoper shines with renewed splendour
New young director of Berlin's Staatsoper has ambitious goals
Adding debt to injury? Las Vegas survivors set for huge medical billsVictims of US gun violence pay a high price – and it is not just their health.

	A new study has found survivors of shootings, on average, rack up
Las Vegas gunman rented room overlooking another music festival week before shooting
Experience Cuban 'Sobremesa'A trip to Latin America to experience the traditional 'sobremesa' and Havana Club limited edition rums
US is 'in mourning,' says Trump after Vegas massacreThe US president said that in the depths of horror, the country "will always find hope"
Las Vegas gunman's gambling habitBy Pete Williams, Tracy Connor and Kalhan Rosenblatt, NBC News 

	The suspected gunman behind the Las Vegas massacre made several large gambling
Las Vegas gunman adapted weapons, set up cameras before premeditated shooting
George Enescu festival draws A-list artistsAmong the highlights at this year’s George Enescu classical music festival was a recital by Israeli violinist and conductor Maxim Vengerov with Vag Papian at the piano, performing César Franck’s Sonat
Stars react to Las Vegas shootingCelebrities have been reacting to the worst mass shooting in modern US history. 

	In Nashville, Tennessee, a host of stars performed at a candlelit
Las Vegas massacre: what we know
Las Vegas shooting: the victimsWhat we know about the 58 victims of the Las Vegas shooting
Heroism of the Las Vegas concert goers who put others first
How did Las Vegas shooter fire so rapidly?
American rock icon Tom Petty dies aged 66American musician Tom Petty has died aged 66. Petty was the lead singer of Tom Petty and the Heartbreakers and had hits such as American Girl and Learning to Fly.
Happiness in 4GMight our smart devices support the search to happiness?
Trump's full speech following the Las Vegas attackThe US president said the attack was "an act of pure evil"
What we know about Las Vegas gunman Stephen PaddockStephen Paddock's father was a violent bank robber who was on the FBI's Most-Wanted list in the 1960s
Las Vegas shooting: at least 58 dead, more than 500 hurt in deadliest US shooting
America's most deadly shootingsBelow is a list of some of the most deadly shootings on US soil
Panic in Las VegasAmateur footage emerged on Monday showing scenes of mass panic and people fleeing after a gunman on the 32nd floor of the Mandalay Bay Hotel and
Las Vegas shooting: Eyewitnesses describe the scene"People were just dropping to the ground", said a concertgoer.
At least 50 dead in Las Vegas shootingAt least 50 people have died and 200 have been injured in a shooting at a concert in a Las Vegas casino
Rockstar Marilyn Manson injured as stage prop knocks him outThe singer was taken to hospital after two giant gun props fell on top of him
Paris Fashion Week: Silk, sequins and sultry underwearFinnish designer Tuomas Merikoski, who created the brand AALTO in 2014, wowed audiences at Paris Fashion Week with his fun, urban,  brightly-coloured collection
Ireland’s thorny abortion debateAbortion is currently illegal in the country, except if a pregnant woman's life is in danger. Rights campaigners will be closely watching what changes are put to voters in a referendum on the issue next year.
Biennale Lyon 2017: modernity via art
Half a day in Munich - Oktoberfest
Campaign urges UK Home Office to grant acclaimed Syrian musician visa for festival"Being forced to leave his home and losing everything was hard enough. To be refused the opportunity to share his art with us all is simply cruel"
